He assures that the people who “beg” for the fish leftovers are Greeks. In the majority old. Pensioners.
Secondly, I use the term 'done' loosely, only because there is a lot of knit-picky finish work to be done. The hardware would all be installed, but the company we got our cabinets from needs to send us several new drawers due to differences in drawer height. Those drawers are on their way this week, thankfully. Also, we need to add the toe kick, fill nail holes, add trim pieces to the island, and seal the marble back splash one more time.
The conclusion came from data collected on almost 900,000 men and women, mostly from Europe and North America.
Yes, please.
On the other hand, if Obama stays in office, she continues to be a sought-after voice of the opposition.
McQuaid: He has to decide what to do with
I waited around and talked with other folks and watched to see one friend come in from the 1oK. When I left, I stopped by the table to see the postings for the 5K. My final time was 31:14, but I was sure the counter was wrong since it listed that I was the 19th runner in. I chalked that up to technology and just went home. When I checked the web site posting later, I was amazed. I finished first in my age group (50 -59) and was 19th across the line of 97. So, not just a PR, but a win as well. That was still hard to believe. My preacher had also finished first in his age group. And, for the naysayers, we weren’t the only ones in the division either.
The picture for Chile includes a transition of leading causes of death along with an accelerated decline of fertility and delayed motherhood. Koch explained that direct causes –those directly attributable to pregnancy condition– were the rule before 1990, but from then, indirect causes –ie. non-obstetric chronic conditions such as hypertension and diabetes among others– rise as the most prevalent, hindering the decline on maternal mortality.
NOHOZ Blog (nohozblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
My New Year's resolution (apart from losing that stone in weight I have managed to gain since June) is to get some sort of regularity into posting here. It will be mostly beer, brewing a bit of food and hopefully a big dollop of food/brewing science chucked in too.
FM Radio RDS
Have I told you lately that I love you
Best Foods Save $.40/1 product 16.5oz+ (4/22)
Yes, a time, I feel sure, when Che Guevara, Trotsky and Marx stared out from the walls of thousands of dirty bedsits, these avatars of an ideology and political practice in every way as abhorrent as fascism. More abhorrent, if the calculus of death plays any part in the assessment of such things. One respondent to the Bright article makes the same point;
Marketer Converge Conference,
The government always promise a bunch of employment opportunities, and to be fair, they really do. But offering jobs locally is just one side of the story. The other side is actually regarding to what happens after having the job— commodities, shelter, family, education, and a whole lot of expenditures which brutally slaps us on our faces saying our wages cannot attend to all of those.
All image rights belong to Euroleague
down at this local watering-hole.
And fights the wind
10. The King's Speech - Okay
I encourage all to have a go!
Why is it that we don’t come seeking life instead of more information and knowledge? Why don’t we come seeking Christ instead of other things? Organic church is really only about one thing – the Lord Jesus Christ Himself! It’s about His life and living by His life with a group of believers. How could it be about anything else?
Poor Stephen fears for his life every time he gets in the passangers seat..
I hear voices of other family members in the next room. laughing, arguing , debating and packing. They are ready to leave. Voices from a distance sound strangely mysterious. I try to catch the words as they drift through the thin walls and dark corridor. My caretaker too is set to leave. She continuously reports how others are irked and exasperated by my decision to stay and wait. Wait for someone to fulfill a promise.
Down on the beach, behind some rocks.
It was about 3pm when an excited Shankar arrived at the station. The station ‘office’ was little bigger than a wardrobe. The ‘platform’ was just a barb wired area. Behind the office room was his ‘quarter’, a little bit bigger. After dropping him off, the train left for Kisumu.
Although most of us probably think that sweatshops no longer exist, every cheap piece of clothing that we buy probably came from one. It wasn't until I read the novel Girl in Translation by Jean Kwok that I understood what goes on in such places. There used to be a "sweatshop" not far from my studio. This place was off limits so to speak - marked by heavy doors with Chinese characters - from which tired and sweaty workers emerged covered with fibres and still wearing dust masks over their faces. I never really gave it much thought until I read this book...
Why am I musing on this stuff? Well, recent events, really.
Thank you, girls! Thank you for being there all these years. If there's anything I know with much certainty, it's this -- we're not just friends, we're sisters for life. :)
-”You’re killing that tree too.”
I have a published poetry book. I’m also leading a series of spiritual awareness intuitive workshop with an Australian friend of mine who’s lived in Egypt for about ten years.
I have read that, with the winds from the right directions, the waters in a tributary of the Red Sea, apparently, really do separate and it is possible, briefly, to literally walk across the sea bed from one side to the other. Something which seems utterly impossible does happen naturally – though very very rarely.
“Excitotoxins have been found to dramatically promote cancer growth and metastasis. In fact, one aspartame researcher noticed that, when cancer cells were exposed to aspartame, they became more mobile … “
What this comes down to is a thorough re-working of the 'pro-life' agenda to expand it and make it pro-development and pro-health with both of those being proactive concerns from the need to remove the horrors of abortion. When the major excuses and reasons NOT to follow the SCOTUS decision are removed and the decision enforced, in full, with the full regulatory authority of States and localities, the issue of 'privacy' for those of the age of consent can be maintained while the custodial accountability (particularly of courts stepping in with children against abusive parents in this venue) can be sustained. By putting the courts on hook for their decision about minors and families in the way of judges stepping in, those judges then become accountable actors in the abortion situation and should be addressed and treated as such.
Tweed skirt, Norton McNaughton - Goodwill
Let’s look at the chronology of events.
* it tries the second and so on. The default is /kernel /usr/kernel
She’s not wrong. Well-meant nudges and winks can feel like pushing and shoving when you’re having a bad day, and it’s difficult to know how to handle gentle, unsolicited encouragement. Smile and nod? Confess to having difficulties conceiving a child and joke about asking the Credit Union for a loan to buy one instead? I’ve always been open and honest about my fertility issues with anyone who’s asked, but that’s harder to maintain when you have a partner and his feelings to consider and the dogs on the street are asking when you’re planning on popping one out because they heard you got hitched a while back. I’m still getting used to the idea that we have fertility issues, not just me. Though it’s of no small comfort to realise that he’s thought of it that way from the get-go. What a mighty good man.
1/2 c. mayonnaise
“I want to raise the stakes.” He declares.
The picture was from his second year birthday bash!
You can also go home with sausages, ham and olive oil. What about that delicious wine you had with lunch? Or the snappy Chardonnay you tasted? No worries, Monsieur Daniel will be more than happy to deliver a case or two the folowing evening.
Halloween hexipuffs.
So here we go. Deja Vu…
Agua de panela tastes like a mix of brown sugar and molasses. Here, it is made on the stove with boiled water. In the bottom of the mug, you may find a surprise – a big chunk of soft cheese that is pulled out in long strings and eaten with a spoon. It’s similar to the way they drink hot chocolate – with cheese. Panela is also used in baking, as a sweetener for coffee and a variety of other things. It is healthier than purified white sugar contains some essential vitamins and minerals.
Kam "Is your name Mattie John?"
- Moody - AGREED
Pancakes with alcohol-soaked cherries (a fortunate by-product of our amazing homemade organic cherry liqueur), drizzled in maple syrup, coffee, and two of the people I love most in the world. Tipsy laughs, listening to good music and then lying down to watch The Beatles movie Help!
In the fifth of the five essays that comprise Anti-Systemic Movements, professors Arrighi, Hopkins and Wallerstein argued that the events of 1848 and 1968 constitute the “only two world revolutions” (authors’ emphasis). Finding strong parallels between 1848 and 1968, the authors situate 1848 as an uprising seeking to fulfill the original hopes and overcome the limitations of the French Revolution, and overturn the counter-revolutions of 1815. The uprisings in 1968, they argued, sought to fulfill the original hopes and overcome the limitations of the Russian Revolution, and overturn the counter-revolutions of 1945, when the United States firmly established its world hegemony. They wrote:
Canvas upon canvas in oils and pastels litter my floor.
Filipinos are mostly brown skinned, but there are a variety of shades from mocha light brown, to sunbathed dark brown, to almost black but not enough to look like African ebony. There are even some Filipinos who look almost like fair-skinned foreigners because they have fair-skinned ancestors. Our colonial masters, the Americans, the Spaniards, and the Japanese, are nations where the fairer ones were once, or, in certain respects, still remain, dominant, powerful, and privileged.
No explanation, no justification. Just, “nope, we’re doing it.”
Happy Valentine's Day to all of you!
Solo Motueka - 4.3% - Single hop pale.
Pet shops in Korea sell not only pet fishes but also pet birds. Those pet shops are usually called 'aquarium'. The vogue irony of pet birds in an aquarium is similar to our musical identity that unaligned with any particular genre. So we named us 'Aquibird', which means birds in aquarium.
Here are some cute ideas of last minute things you can do for Valentine's Day.
I have now been in Morocco for three days, but it feels like it’s been at least a month. The 40 of us Peace Corps Trainees (PCTs) are staying at a youth center near downtown Fes with a great group of PC staff members, both American and Moroccan. Most of our time is spent in various trainings and language class so we haven’t had much of an opportunity yet to explore the city or meet many Moroccans outside of the staff, but that will come. We have gotten trainings in health, safety, security, Peace Corps policies and expectations, and some discussion about Islam, Moroccan history and politics.
Wolfgang Hampel, author of the Betty MacDonald Biography and winner of the first Betty MacDonald Memorial Award founded Betty MacDonald Fan Club and Society in 1983. We are the largest Betty MacDonald Fan Club in the world - with members in 30 countries. Join our wonderful international Betty MacDonald Community!
The prime minister also said in a sarcastic tone that his 30-second punishment deserved to be included in the Guinness Book of World Records.
A few seedless Grapes (halved)
Good luck everybody!
I left Bath at 1100 and deposited my car at Ken’s house in Bristol, then we RV’d with Guy near Avonmouth and headed up the M5 to Cannock to pick up Neil. The drive up was easy, if long, but a pit stop at the side of Loch Lomond at a very well stocked pub revived us!
WATCH OUT!
With proper nourishment like that gained from a daily intake of Hemp Seeds, and a rest from having to process high starch, high sugar, high saturated fat content foods, your body will heal many of the modern day health issues faced.
The controller box is also utilised to transport your signaling system on when you are leaving your domicile and is determining to any safeguard clock group.
Written and Directed Richard Curtis
I’ll tell it another time, when I’m high. Really relive all the details. I haven’t gotten closure yet, maybe then I will.
I spilled some ink on Mommy's rug;
After several years of our annual Easter shopping spree (care of our generous grandparents), I have learned a few things that help make the process easier and more successful. Trust me, we've whittled down the trip from 4+ hours to 2 hours (I know this sounds ridiculous, but think about five girls selecting and trying on 15-20 pieces each and then deciding on five items each to take home).
Funny that I can spend half a day dreaming about what I will say in my next blog post and when I finally arrive at that much anticipated moment, my brain wants to look up baby animals on YouTube instead?
I had quite a bit of the filling left over so I used it in this noodle dish.
it was just simple looks and glances,
Off-the-shoulder interviews tend to have quite a different feel to tripod/pedestal interviews. They are less formal, less restricted, and involve more movement. Because the participants are usually standing or moving around, the impression is given of being “up and about” rather than sitting sedately in a studio setting. Indeed, off-the-shoulder cameras are sometimes used in studio settings to achieve this effect.
A little late I’m linking up my tots first day at school with ‘Yeah Write’, hop over and check out the other entries if you like:
My current suspects are:
- Noel Vegan Fitness Star
One of the major barriers to awareness and understanding is that people with the condition do not “look” disabled.
Listen to the title track here:
- Tariq Hafiz, Supervisory Patent Examiner for Art Unit 3623;
Anyhow, I've become friendly with the nice lady that works the drive-thru where I do my banking and I noticed that she had a sassy new haircut. "Who does your hair?" I asked.
2 cloves garlic (finely chopped)
Bet you didn't expect to find me making a post on the Fairy's blog did you?
We’re still talking about work right? Can I tell you how many people don’t understand a debit card vs. a credit card? I’ll offer a customer a credit card and they’ll say, “I already have one”. I’ll ask who it’s through and they’ll reply, “with you.” No you don’t. That’s a debit card for withdrawing money from your account via an ATM or Point of Sale. “but it says Visa”. I have to explain further… and sometimes even further. These are probably the descendants of the people who thought that as long as they have checks, they have money in the account.
Lopez is scheduled to be executed by lethal injection next Wednesday at the state prison in Florence in what would be the fourth execution in Arizona this year.
The record came out in 1988, and seriously? Only 100 copies pressed? That seems like a waste but maybe records were cheaper to press back then? I saw this record for sale at the Underground and didn't buy a copy because I knew I had it recorded on tape at home. I won that round! Released by Chapter III Records in Arizona in 1988. At that time I was a junior at Eldorado High School. I lived across the street from the entrance to EHS at 1114 Linn Lane. My front lawn was the smoking section. That was a lifetime ago.
For Whom The Funeral Bell Tolls is now available in trade paperback and ebook on Amazon.
Worrying about?
Does Michael Pollan really consider those to be fighting words?
I have a new mini-obsession - vintage mug shot photos. Kind of weird I know... It all started when I stumbled across a blog post on Adore Vintage about a collection of vintage police photos from Sydney, Australia, that included several mug shots of both men and women. This one I fell in love with completely:
Store leftovers covered in fridge. Serves 12.
African Men for Sexual Health and Rights
Because all French parents look after their children financially (food, accommodation, cinema tickets, trips to Subway, holidays, new clothes, pocket money, etc) until they are 32, you could be 18, or you could be 23: the CROUS don't care. They want to know what your parents earn. If your parents are poor enough, you could be eligible for a grant. Only if you're French though. You can still be eligible if you're an EU citizen, but you need to prove your parents have been working here in France for 2 years. So basically - not very many of us foreigners are going to get the gift of government aid during our stay here in this delightful country. Which means that I am extremely lucky with this room.
Galatians 3:22 But the Scripture has shut up all men under sin, that the promise by faith in Jesus Christ might be given to those who believe.
FMF’s support semi will be on hand at certain events to provide trackside support for all of its athletes and to showcase the leading exhaust systems in the world. In addition to exhausts, the new casual line of FMF/Joe Gibbs Racing apparel will be available for purchase, which JGRMX rider Davi Millsaps can be seen wearing between motos in the paddock.
I joined in a Rainbow Quilt Charm Swap. As of this morning there are a few spaces left. Swapping 5 yards of charms with one being a solid and the other four prints. You will get back just as many charms. Should be a great swap. Click over to Breakfast for Dinner blog if interested.....it should be fun!
i will see things that i’ve never seen
I was at another blog I follow earlier where they spoke of giving yourself permission to do this or that when it gets a little scary when you write and wonder about things. Giving yourself permission to relax, maybe take a walk, get away from the manuscript for a while, helps me. I think we writers put too much pressure on ourselves when it comes to getting something done. Deadlines and so forth. If they work for you. Fine. But if you feel as though you've driven yourself into a wall. Stop it. Give yourself permission to sit back and not write but have a little fun.
Phase two starts tomorrow. A reorganisation of my days to take the best possible advantage of time every day. Andrea has agreed to let me start taking classes every day, five days a week. Mondays I'm booked for a full day, two classes with a one hour break for lunch, from ten am to five pm. Tuesday to Friday, I'm in class in the mornings and working in the afternoon, either at home or at the office, and then working an extra day on Saturday. Work has kindly allowed me to shift my work week over one day, to go Tuesday to Saturday. We've been needing someone to monitor the world on Saturdays, so this will work out well for LSN too.
He came to me
Lost beneath the sea
One of the attacks took place just hours after Taylor, who had no previous convictions, returned home from a Newcastle Borough Council meeting.
Hold on. The railyards would be about 8.3 acres of a 22-acre site. Some of the buildings are decaying, some are not, and some have been recently rehabilitated.
It’s been a long time between posts, though not due to slacking. I’ve been working on a novel I’d forgotten about, which is now finished and on sale at Amazon. This is my first eBook and I like the idea — you write the book you want without interference from an agent or a publisher (I’ve published three books via traditional means so have some experience here).
it was obvious to anyone who knows and loves our little boy . . .
And what of the economic downturn?(I love these phrases that governments and economists have come up with!)
Pure Innocence Scientist stamp set
The study appears in a recent edition of Journal of Human Evolution. The authors of the study include: Thomas Breuer of the Wildlife Conservation Society and the Max Planck Institute for Evolutionary Anthropology; and Andrew M. Robbins, Christophe Boesch, and Martha M. Robbins of the Max Planck Institute for Evolutionary Anthropology.
Wow, it’s December already, and there’s still so much left to talk about regarding the 2011 season. Several events left to review and some outstanding performances to look at. And I’m going to try to get to as much as I can before the clock turns to 2012.
Thanks so much for visiting with me today & I hope to be creating more soon. On a side note: I injured my knee about a month ago & it's taking forever & a day to heal so I haven't been able to jump around in my craft room which is really my dining room LOL (yeah.....like I can really "jump"....LOL). So I hope to be crafting more since Christmas is drawing near. OMGosh.........did I just say that? LOL (I'll go sit in the corner now.....LOL) So until next time.......be blessed!
There are now 153,000 books that are Prime Eligible compared to about 65,000 in January. Not all of those are in the KDP Select program, but for simplicity sake let's say the number of books eligible for a Select free run has doubled since the first of the year and posit that there are now twice as many books being offered free as there were then. If all the books being made free on a given day were being downloaded equally, then it should take roughly half the number of downloads now than it did in January to reach a given rank. But that's not what we're seeing. We're seeing it take the same number of downloads to hit a given rank even though there are almost twice as many books available.
Just now he took the Spawn off my hands for a bit, so I could have a break. He then asked "okay, so what's the plan?" Plan? Uh, you take the Spawn for a bit and I sit here and have a break, that's the mofo plan! I don't care what you do with her, but I am doing SOMETHING ELSE. I'm still not sure what he wanted. I folded the clothes. I'll do dishes with him in a bit. I'll get on the sorting of the bathroom boxes at some point, just not right now. Right now I am having me a Spawn-free moment. Go away before I hit you over the head with this skillet!
Breitbart was so hated by the left that rumors surfaced that he might have been murdered. I myself considered the possibility that, in an attempt to embarass Breitbart, his enemies might have drugged his drink, which might have resulted in his death. But in all likelihood Breitbart, who lived hard and relentlessly in all areas of his life and in fact never slowed down, was a literal heart attack waiting to happen, suffering as he did from a bad heart.
There are days when I think we'd all be better off if we didn't exchange money, if we exchanged goods and services instead. Bartering is the way to go, I think, sometimes.
Secondly my workout routine is ruined since my friend who usually does it with me fucked us over since he had some shit to tend to.
One more favor to ask: please click on the Cards for Debby picture above or this link to read about our design team member Debby who could use your thoughts and prayers and a card to cheer her after a serious accident. Thanks so much!
Yeast - up to you!
We’re about 90percent done with this room. Heather is painting a table to hold the CUTEST log cabin doll house! More pics. of that and the quilts after they’re hung next week. That’s it for today. Enjoy the eye candy! I wish I could sleep in this room at night!
I made this cute collages because I seriously
RICK
“Arsenal Playmaker Samir Nasri Set for £35m Barcelona Move If Gunners Win Title”
I hope this helps.
Before I’d even sat down, the dietician busted out her rubber fruits and vegetables and started playing kitchen.
Wouldn’t you?
12. Catechism of the Catholic Church, Libreria Editrice Vaticana, Paulist Press, 1983, 803 pages
Kelburn's Cart Blanche was next. It's another local beer made just outside Glasgow. A small family micro-brewery turning out 30 barrels a week of consistent, well made tasty beer. It's fairly malty with a delicate and lovely hop balance. I've had it on better form but taking into account that it was being taken from the cask, decanted into jugs and then carried across the brewery to our tables it was still an enjoyable beer.
CALABAMA has an "official" pub date of June 15, and it may be a few days before it's available on Nook and some of the other e-book platforms. But it's already up on Kindle and Smashwords. Only $2.99.
The Earth doesn’t care about age or wrinkles. What’s a decade or two when you’re a billion years old and a few cracks when you’re scarred regularly by earthquakes?
Today, I’m delighted to introduce Julia Churchill to Absolute Vanilla readers.
- I listened to mariachi bands (they sound exactly like the 3 Amigos guys, it's uncanny.)
This happened about a week ago...
An American flag will hang by the door,
I just figured out that I've NEVER brewed a brown ale. Charlie Papazian's article and recipe for an American Brown Ale in the Mar/Apr edition of Zymurgy has inspired me. I think I'll brew my own version of this for my next "session beer" to have on tap. Session beer is defined by:
With time on my hands I have already updated my goals for 2009 list, which I will periodically profile as the New Year approaches and beyond. Writing about the lofty personal expectations will help keep me accountable. In 2008 I proved to myself that if I dream big and put my fears aside I am completely able to navigate through various self-imposed challenges and come out the other end in a much better state than I expected. I mean, that’s all easier said than done, right? I’m ready to do that again times 10 but in a way, I’m starting from scratch with no job at the moment and technically, the Hubs isn’t employed either. His new record doesn’t come out until the spring and who knows what will come of it (but I have high hopes since it TOTALLY RULES!). This a scary place in which to begin.
Viv was still missing a few dances though and sent me off to play (as she puts it). Janis said she had seen this in my blogs and did not realise that Viv actually said this.
are content with their lifestyle, and don’t want it to change. Let’s give them a name. Let’s call them “Tolowa” or “Yurok” or “Dakota.” Or let’s say they are the Kayopo, living on the Xingu River. And now let’s say that those in power decide they want the landbase on which (or rather with whom) this community lives. What happens next? Does anyone really believe that those in power won’t destroy the community and steal the resources? This genocide isn’t a thing of the past: The Kayopo are being driven from their land right now, to make way for the Belo Monte dam.
Thank you for your time and happy gaming.
My only complaint with this book was the ending. I felt like it was far too abrupt than it should have been. It was like the author just got tired of taking them through trials and decided to end it instead of writing anymore. The ending felt very slapped on, instead of that we had finally reached that point where there was no other choice but to end the story.
Please keep in mind that you can only claim one drink per hour and only one drink per bar a day. This app is perfect for bar hopping and pub crawls. Already redeemed your digital drink ticket at the bar? No problem. Wait an hour. Then visit another bar in the network to redeem a digital drink ticket from the next bar.
I think mostly the conspiracy theorists are fear-mongerers, seeding that tiny amount of doubt that the ‘common’ explanation which may spark them to become a conspiracy theorist themselves.
The patch of earth it's sitting on is where our pond used to be, we filled it in so we could have chickens, the whole area was fenced off when we had the pond, so we intend to patch up the fences and when the weathers nice the chickens will be able to come out to play in the larger area, and when we go out or if the weather isn't so good they will be in their run and coop.
cause (less than $0.14 per dollar of income).
The Beast Folk, as the half-human animals are called in the book, can also be interpreted as the natives of counties that the British Empire subjugated during the colonisation. Forcing people to give up their own culture and their ways in order to adopt the values, language and religion of Europeans is very clear since the Beast Folk have to live by rules that are not natural to them: don’t eat meat, don’t walk on all fours, don’t drink water from the stream by lying down on the ground. Eventually, the animals revolt (after having tasted blood) and they slowly revert back to their original form, claiming the island as theirs.
Other times just putting it away and then coming back to it with 'fresh' eyes helps...
We hate the idea of being forced to join a union who then spends our dues money taken from us by force on politicians we wouldn't even piss on if they were aflame. We hate the fact that your racism is seen as kindness, while our realism is seen as racism. We hate that you're so blindingly ignorant, stupid and obtuse that you believe "diversity" is a good thing, never realizing that diversity only means different, not better or worse. We hate your unrealistic view of the world, seeking a false equality based on nothing more than existence without merit. We hate that no matter how many times we calmly explain the precepts of Natural Law, Liberty and Free Market Capitalism you're only retort is "Oh yeah? You're a racist/bigot/hateful/misogynist."
This does seem like I’m simply trying to find a religion in which to convert to so I can become a board-certified chaplain one day, but I view this more as furthering my journey along my path for the search of my own truth. I am able to watch myself discern possibilities and new discoveries, and I am examing current beliefs as well as forming new ones, or simply exploring in my case of unsureness.
Tony my mechanic returned from holidays Sept. 3rd and I told him I was thinking of shutting the shop down. He was pretty freaked out that I might shut things down, but he understood. I’ve noted on Thurs., Sept. 5th “I’ve had enough! – told Lou” and that’s when I’d finally gotten to the point of no return at the shop and called my manager Lou. I had also called for final meter readings on my utilities. I have a slow fuse, but once it goes off, it’s immediate usually and this was the day I blew.
A handful of platitudes that ranged from the dismissive
only imagine how hard his heart was beating when he took that long jog out to
Excitement and nervousness stirred in our kids--uneasy about the unknown. We arrived at the school. The schoolyard was filled with children dressed in blue & white uniforms. The sheer numbers of students amazed us. Six years ago only 40 students attended. Today almost 600 students attend in two sessions--morning and afternoon. The wealthy Dominicans and nationals pay for their kids to go to school in the morning session. Then in the afternoon session the poor families especially the Haitian children go to school for free.
“This isn’t how I wanted it between us.” Judson grabbed the neckline of her sweater, dragging her body to meet his with a solid thump. Sunny licked her lips in answer to the question in his eyes. He lowered his head to move his mouth over hers.
This free event will run through June and includes presentations from Tellman Knudson, Gary Douglas, Guy Finley, Dr. Sue Morter, Rikka Zimmerman, and many more. You can sign up here.
Have you ever shopped at Zara Home? The stores I've been in were beautifully designed and the price point is generally very reasonable. What was your favorite thing from their new catalog? Aside from the buyables, I adore the mint green color they have on the walls. So pretty, isn't it?
unbelievable to some. Try it, get a dog, love it, experience
Last weekend while playing basketball outside with some neighbors I overheard Tortuga and Corazon talking about loving me:
8) Any Wheat Beer in Germany
Amygdala
Size of the dog is no guarantee as to the kind of dog. Some small dogs are great for security. Some large dogs make wonderful alarms. Almost any “cute” breed can become ornamental. So, decide what kind of dog you want and select well. Remember, even ornamental dogs need training.
THEY ARE ASSOCIATED WITH JUDAISM / CHRISTIANITY / ISLAM
Who is Fethullah Gulen?
listening to Tori Amos, and only Tori,
Reality. Yes, Paris is a huge tourist destination, and as a result is riddled with the cultural caricatures and commercial junk thought to appeal to the perceived lowest common denominator of taste and experience. But alongside that—sometimes literally—it is Parisian business as usual, the daily business of millions of people living and working in a complex urban ecosystem that has been growing and developing for centuries as the cultural and commercial heart of France, and which can absorb the vagaries of tourists along with any number of other incidents that occur in the daily round. Case in point: my visit to E. Dehillerin, the renowned kitchen store, where local chefs and clueless visitors are treated with the same brisk courtesy, and where the complicated system of actually making a purchase (involving at least 3 employees) remains unchanged, regardless of how many people are in line. It may not be the most convenient way, but it’s their way, and I’m glad to have experienced it.
1/2 tsp sea salt
The Prius c’s user interface is very much in the mainstream. As with many compact and subcompact cars there’s a digital display with the important info along the base of the windshield. On the c Two this includes an iPod-size version of the Liftback’s center-stack LCD (a center-stack LCD is optional, and standard on the c Three and c Four), which is controlled by a steering-wheel mounted button. A lot less distracting, actually.
5. It is very clear that the most direct means to short term and decadal length predictions is through the study of the interactions of the atmospheric sytems ,ocean currents and temperature regimes – PDO ,ENSO. SOI AMO AO etc etc. and the SST is a major measure of these systems.Certainly the SST data has its own problems but these are much less than those of the land data.
Nursing has decreased a lot- especially now that we're down to one nap. He is really only nursing before the nap and before bedtime. Occasionally he'll ask for it between breakfast and lunch or between dinner and bedtime, but other than that, it's really only twice a day. He is still nursing a few times during the night, but not for long at all. It's almost like he latches on only for a few seconds.
Interest in Eastern religions has been present for a hundred years and more in the West, and has been gaining especially in the 20th century; but it has always been a fringe movement in society, and only in the last decade or so have we seen the institution of native Western temples and monasteries, with seemingly normal American young men and women bowing to the ground before Buddhist and Hindu gods…
1. Think about exactly what this space is going to store and try to envisage what you would like it to look like and what things should go in which space.
Continue from the previous issue, we are still now at the alleyway called “Trok Long Moo” or “Soi Sukon 1”. I personally call this alleyway as a “stomach feeder” area. This area in not only full of good food, but also 24/7 for food! In the morning you can find one thing. In the night, there will be other things to eat. From late night to early morning, you also can find another thing which is also eatable and riches taste! This alleyway is also really close to the Hua Lumpong train station (approx. 10 mins walking), china town or Yaowarat (approx. 5 mins by bus) so if you plan to visit the restaurant, there is also a lot of place that you can visit before or after the meal.
After the quiz, I stayed in Belfast for a couple more days and went to four more schools - Thompson, Kells & Connor, St Paul’s and St Bernard’s - many thanks to everyone who organised the visits and came along to hear me speak.
and I got siam to the corner and see's nothing
What to expect: You can expect their ages to range from older teenagers to young adults, they will most likely be either a boy or a girl. On occasion the distinction is unclear. They tend to wear ‘vintage’ clothes that normally smells like a billion year old man previously wore them. Items consist but are not limited to: leather slip on shoes -tight skinny jeans of various and vibrate colours – various patterned tights – checkered shirts – cut off jeans with frays – chinos – large scarfs – large pieces of jewellery often of retro origins and design – shirts that look like you are wearing a suit or other type of clothing.
like Father, like Son,
This is your most important analysis on why the Gaudiya Matha failed:
4And God shall wipe away all tears from their eyes; and there shall be no more death, neither sorrow, nor crying, neither shall there be any more pain: for the former things are passed away.
I loved the December Winter's Eve Kit...
Pour half of batter into greased 9×13 pan.
In the end – paranoid about publicity relating to The Brain Room – Newscorp bought Floorgraphics outright after a $29.5M settlement had been turned down by the corporate victim. Clearly, Rupe’s investigation impressed the mogul so much, he bought the company. Or something like that.
You may be a glutton for punishment, and willing to read more. That's what this is all about.
behind the spaceship
As I drew in my head, and was turning around,
Don't worry mom, it's statistically safer than a morning commute to work.
When Mike Mignola tires (however briefly) of a steady diet of Hellboy, he turns to diversions such as creating The Amazing Screw-On Head.
Thus he becomes uncertain of his life, for what it is has been denied by him. It is for this denial that you need Atonement. Your denial made no change in what you are. But you have split your mind into what knows and does not know the truth. You are yourself. There is no doubt of this. And yet you doubt it. But you do not ask what part of you can really doubt yourself. It cannot really be a part of you that asks this question. For it asks of one who knows the answer. Were it part of you, then certainty would be impossible.
Until I tried to use that reasoning with Justin. He didn't buy it and said it wasn't true. Thanks, hon.
15 March
“The sun was warm but the wind was chill.
"She does like people to speak proper English. I’ve fallen into a terrible habit: when people ask me how I am, I say, “I’m good.” Vivienne will often correct me, and say, “You can’t say that. You have to say you’re ‘well’.” PA Tizer Bailey on working for Dame Vivienne, via Cos.
Once more, it thus seems, as the very final plays were beginning to emerge, rabbits are being pulled out of hats at breathtaking speed. And most of them may be speaking French.
I’d rather toss it out,
Unlike the "true Candor," I don't see everything in black and white. In fact, I don't really see any thing in black and white. I believe in truth, but many of those truths are not absolute, as I see them. And even where I see a truth as absolute, I think that others have have every right to believe something different.
FourSquare
It’s possible I might want to make the cuffs and truncated fingers a shade longer, but those changes are easily made and tracked. It’s the pattern for doing the fingers that I needed help with. Some kind soul has already done it in an in-the-round design. Perfect. I don’t imagine I’ll finish the gloves this weekend but as the forecast is for chilly weather, knitting sounds like a very useful thing to be doing. What are you plans for the weekend? Knitting? Or something far more exciting? May it be an enjoyable one, whatever you’re up to.
~You MUST post to the Inky Impressions Inspirational Blog a minimum of 1 time per month, dates to be assigned at the beginning of your term.
Today in Italy we celebrate the “Festa della Liberazione”, the 67th anniversary of the liberation of Italy from fascism and Nazi German occupation. A national holiday in Italy, this day will be marked by both commemoration and celebration – from solemn ceremonies of remembrance to parades, speeches and open air concerts in Italian piazzas. The biggest ceremony is held in Milan, the site some of the fiercest fighting, and of the grotesque public display of Mussolini’s body in the days that followed. However, despite the numerous events planned to mark the occasion at national and local level, the ‘festa della liberazione’ has never been a straightforward day of celebration for all Italians.
Enjoy whatever weather you have in your world,
First, we decorated the planting pots as "heads," as we were trying to grow "grass hair" on the heads. The children had fun doing this - some understood the concept more than others, but either way, the activity was enjoyed! We then took great delight in digging in the dirt and did the children did extremely well considering that four were asked to share each small bucket of dirt. We used small plastic spoons to "shovel" the dirt into our pots to help enhance the fine motor skills of those in need! The grass is really starting to fill in now... 3 weeks later. I had hoped to use wheat grass as it is the wider-blade grass that seems to grow and fill in quicker, however, I wasn't able to find any when I was at the store, so I ended up with a different, finer variety. For next year, I will definitely make sure to locate the wheat grass somewhere!
-24FanForever (Rita)
With this in mind, I’m going to do something a little bit different with you today. I’m going to give you a little break from thinking you’re a horrible mess, by allowing you to see what a horrible mess really looks like. You have all been working so hard up to this point; bearing your souls, naked before God and confessing your sins so that we might pray for one another and be healed of our sickness: the desire to rule over our husbands.
Doe Maar Sinds een dag of twee NL
2-3 sprigs fresh thyme
Yes the implication here is rape.
When the micro-insurance program was formally launched in January 2011, clients embraced it, gladly paying 3% of their loan amount as a premium. When floods hit southern Haiti nine months ago, Fonkoze received a payment from its insurance partners of more than $1 million, enabling it to quickly get 4,000 clients back on their feet without a single dollar of “aid.”
I want to eat
Good morning Starshine! The Earth says, "Hello!"
So those are 3 reasons you cant lose weight. These are unreasonable expectations and beliefs you may unconsciously have that could be sabotaging your weight loss efforts.
We all grow up... Maybe not always acting as adults,
JS: I completely agree with you Jack. Horror writers are some of the most passionate out there. Writing good horror is hard. Really hard. Sure, you can gore things up and make a passage uncomfortable to read but can you really entice those reactions of actual fear out of a reader? Gore is uncomfortable but fear is primal. It’s not an easy feat to elicit fear mainly because not everyone reacts the same way to the same thing. I’m a firm believer that you have to immerse yourself in your work in order to get those reactions. As a horror writer, you owe it to your readers. Horror is defined in its plainest terms as an intense feeling of fear, shock or disgust. While I’m writing I like to build on those emotions, sometimes alone and sometimes in harmony. I find that the intense build to a singular moment can be a bigger pay off than injecting horrific moments just for horror’s sake. It’s that rollercoaster ride within the pages that sticks with you.
That’s a vexed question just now, and not only because the current US president used the word to get into office via one of the most monumentally cynical political campaigns of modern times. Even before it got stripped of its remaining content by Obama’s marketing team, the old virtue of hope had gotten tangled up in America’s culture of entitlement, and twisted completely out of shape in the service of cynical marketing disguised as cheap sentimentality. "When you wish upon a star, makes no difference who you are, anything your heart desires will come to you..." Readers of a certain generation will remember hearing that bit of doggerel out of the mouth of an animated insect. I knew a small boy who, after seeing the movie in question, took to singing, "When you wish upon a star, you don’t see things as they are." Like most children, he knew better, and hated being on the receiving end of lies. I sympathized, having had exactly the same reaction a quarter of a century earlier.
The funeral rites took place at the church of the Holy Trinity. It is estimated that between 10,000 and 30,000 people attended. Franz Schubert, timid and a huge admirer of Beethoven, without ever having become close to him, was one of the coffin bearers, along with other musicians. Schubert died the next year and was buried next to Beethoven.
It was fascinating for us to learn that the Yamato family has been ruling Japan for over 800 years. To understand more about this unique situation and to know more about this family, we watched the following clip:
If I can hear “Sultans of Swing” or “Money for Nothing” on the radio or while shopping for butter, I know things are going to be okay and that I can enjoy my burrito-less environment.
On a very cold day we went outside and played volleyball (Haley even played five days after having a baby! What??!). Darcy played in the big pile of leaves while we played and loved it. Here she is with Ashley.
As Always If Anyone Would Be Willing To Angel A Swap or Take On 2 Partners for May Please Let Me Know. All Help is Appreciated! Sometimes as With Odd Numbers Or Other Happenings May Cause Me To Be Short A Partner for Someone!
We used to count each white petal on the flower and at the same time we would say “loves me” and “loves me not”. The last petal would tell if true love was going to happen in the future.
Christopher Charles Amoroso, 29, New York, N.Y.
When parents at one North Carolina school refused to return a library book that featured a gay main character, the issue drew mixed reactions and international attention. Some parents wrote to the school to ask that their child not be given access to the book. Conversely, others wrote to ask that their son or daughter read the text. Before the controversy settled down, 32 copies of the book were donated to the school’s library, from as far away as Australia.
So try a bottle of dolcetto and I guarantee you will fall in love with it. Look for Dolcetto D’Alba or Dolcetto D’Asti which are as authentic as you can get. If you are looking for California dolcettos, Santa Cruz has a few wineries which make outstanding dolcettos as well. And if you are going to pair it with food, make sure whatever you are making has tomatoes in it. Cheers.
Your web template is your first impression. It's like meeting someone for the first time. Would you make a good impression the way you are or does your site scream out every word with huge font type and bright colors as if by assaulting their eyes you are yelling in their ear. Do your products stand on their own, or are you going to CONVINCE the buyer that they HAVE to buy it by YELLING AT THEM. Or does trying to find an item on your site become a game of hide and seek because they have to click through a dozen links to get there? How about the text and pictures on your pages? Is it direct and to the point with perhaps a few pictures for accent or does the text go on and on and the visitor has to scroll for miles to get to the bottom of the page? If this describes your site then it's time to clean for clean up. Your site should be a pleasant experience for your visitors so they will want to come back time and again - willingly. Is it pleasant to look at and easy to navigate? Are your products, categories and pages well organized and easy to find? How about the essentials - an obvious link to view what’s in their cart, to get back to your home page and to contact you if needed? Your website is your best dress or suit. PUT IT ON and greet your potential buyers as if they are important to you. A sloppy website gives the impression of disorganization, unprofessionalism & a sloppy attitude.
Somehow I manage to complete my shopping in under four hours and head for the check-outs where my kids start in on a chorus of, “Can we have candy?” What evil minded person decided it would be a good idea to put a display of candy in the check-out lanes, right at a child’s eye level? Obviously someone who has never been shopping with children.
The final item I found was this metal, vintage, matchstick holder/dispenser. It has such a great red and green retro look. It would also make a great paperclip dispenser or key holder. I can imagine so many uses.
Way to go Henry!
Round and round the school I went,
I'm back at work. I wish I were back at home. But the bank account dictates where I go, and where I go now is the office. So.
Yesterday, Mike and I returned from our FIRST EVER vacation together. (I suppose it is our second if you count our honeymoon, over two years ago.) We drove five hours to Gatlinburg, TN and stayed in a private chalet, complete with a hot tub on the back deck, called “A Lover’s Paradise.” Gatlinburg itself is an absolute tourist trap, but it is the gateway city into the Smoky Mountains National Park, which I enjoyed far more than I thought I would.
and he added lights inside so I can use it
20. How do you know your mom loves you? "''cause she laughs when I say I'm cooler, and she doesn't beat me"
“Maybe I can alter the script to get Vicodin,” I speculated.
Dear author:
December 3 – Reindeer Run Half Marathon, Amelia Island, FL 2:33:49
Is it just a weakness or a disease when one keeps adding more colours to a travel palette? Maybe it's insecurity: what if I need my manganese blue? It could be a case of conspicuous consumption: Darling, these aren't even all my watercolours.
It’s odd that Biden didn’t have something to say because politicians get hit on this all the time. Republican or Democrat, people always tell elected officials they want their taxes lowered.
Why do chimpanzees throw poop? The federal government would like to know and is using your tax dollars to investigate the matter. Every single year, we all send huge amounts of our hard-earned money to the federal government. We hope that they will spend that money wisely. Unfortunately, that is simply not the case. You are about to read some examples of how the government is wasting your money that are absolutely mind blowing. Anyone that claims that there is not a lot of waste that can be cut out of the federal budget is lying to you. Our politicians have racked up the biggest pile of debt in the history of the world and they are spending our money on some of the stupidest things imaginable. It is imperative that the American people be educated about all of this outrageous government waste, because right now the political will to change this corrupt system is simply not there among the current crop of politicians in Washington. We are stealing trillions of dollars from future generations and many of the things that our politicians are wasting that money on are almost too bizarre to believe......
Ha ha. Where do I start? Oh hey, how about the beginning. Ohio Boy texts me @ 5pm to invite me to something that starts at 6. Er …… okay, I’m a loser & had no plans and his plans involved bar hopping, so hell yeah! Sign me up. Anyway, this event was hysterical, I can’t say the name of it because god forbid this blog comes up in a google search, but it involved 200+ people dressed as either Santa Clause or Mrs Santa and doing a pub crawl in South Scottsdale. Now, mind you, with such stellar notice and having no clue that everyone was dressing up, I did not. So here I am, in a sea of Santas, in jeans & a leather jacket (well, I was wearing more than that, but you get the idea). It was a total blast & everyone was really cool.
So, now that I'm able to smile without pain, eat soft food and be out of the house, I'm too busy doing all of the above to really have a good conversation with 'you', my imaginary friend.
Search: “Sneezy” from Snow White psychological disorders
If you have been tagged, you will find your name at the end of this post. You should then, copy the rules (or your version of them), and the set of questions onto your blog post, provide your own answers, and then tag 5 new people.
Of the bloggers I regularly read and love, Jen (A Little Bird Told Me) and Reena (Fashion Daydreams) are the two that rock the coloured jean look in a way I can only dream of. Leaving me in my selection of black jeans (my favourite!) hoping that the darker denim look will be back on trend in no time!
How far will Rose go to keep a promise? The recent Strigoi attack at St. Vladimir’s Academy was the deadliest ever in the school’s history, claiming the lives of many. Even worse, the Strigoi took some of their victims with them - including Dimitri. He’d rather die than be one of them, and now Rose must abandon her best friend, Lissa—the one she has sworn to protect no matter what—and keep the promise Dimitri begged her to make long ago. But with everything at stake, how can she possibly destroy the person she loves most? From Amazon UK
Now, if you do encounter a stolen vehicle, be on the alert and report the matter immediately to the authorities.
Impressive, how the lawyer unfolds a patient flirt, on those yellow blue-waters,
J Neurol Sci. 2001 Feb 15;184(1):89-92.
Now don't get the wrong idea. I fight for the little guy (that is why I want to go to law school). I have been the little guy many, many times in legal battles. Just ask former Chicago Whitesox slugger, Frank Thomas about it. I can no longer "use the term Bighurt, or The Big Hurt" ever again (God, I hope I don't get sued for using the term "Bighurt" in my blog post).
For anyone who has taken an English class, you should now the basic pattern of a story.
Now I need to do this with my pantry. The pile of bags in my pantry is very large. It's going to be a challenge.
Or would you throw the branch away and attend to the wound if any and proceed as though nothing happened….
I'll have one more post when my distress markers come in. See I have something to look forward to.
16. leader
God. What is the protocol on this? I don't want to walk with a stranger for 5 blocks. Obviously, with certain strangers I would walk the ends of the Earth. This was not one of those strangers.
“I can’t believe you haven’t.”
–p. 8
Hello daar almal..!
It's a tie, a birthday hat, and a diaper cover....and a birthday shirt to match!
The American Legislative Exchange Council, a “stealth business lobbyist” that helps corporations write state and federal legislation supporting their interests, has taken major heat for its backing of controversial laws.
It's important to keep our bodies strong - there is so much they are capable of - we need to respect that.
Sitting here, having a glass of Chardy, as a famous (infamous) Aussie Blogger calls it, on a Friday on my porch. For a 4 day week (Monday was Memorial Day) it seemed rather long.
An elephant is not a British species, even if it is the third generation calf of a mother born in a travelling circus and now living in Regents Park Zoo. Tiger breeding programmes at Longleat do not claim to be producing “British Tigers”, neither are the giraffes and zebras which contentedly live out their days in the same “Safari Park” ever anything other than African animals.
Push pull is easy when interacting with a woman when you are taking more of the teasing/playful approach and mixing it in with a little seriousness and showing of interest. IOW’s the woman is being pushed & pulled in different directions but in a good and exciting way. Also a man that can push pull in a flirting situation shows he is a bit more complex in his ability to not have a one track way of interacting with a woman. Most men flirt and show interest in one manner and keep going on that same route until they close. That’s fine but if you plan on interacting and engaging the woman for more than a few minutes, she’ll eventually start getting bored and want to end the conversation or she’ll start looking for outs (looking around for friends or others to mingle with).
No, because that would just be pretend. Made up. About as original as recreating a New-York style theme park for your restaurant.
Newcastle Occupation of the Fine Art building is coming to an end on Sunday 11th December by 2pm. This is a direct response to the actions of University management today, who have threatened not only University disciplinary action, but also began legal action.
One of the things I love on the coasts of the Cornish landscape is the miniaturisation of everything. The thorn trees are small and windskewed. The blue scabious is just a few cms tall. Wild thyme is tiny; the milkworts almost so small you barely see them.
THE FIRST ACT
The scene opens with "Tony" locking the doors. He sounds pretty upset about something. I wonder what's got him all worked up.
Love brings joy.
We see so many needy people, so many widows and prisoners and sick people who live so close to home. Often times, I think people think of missions as foreign service and forget to think about their own communities. Missions is not foreign service. It’s just service, in the name of Jesus as His authentic follower. That can be accomplished right here in my own community as well as across the globe. Times up.
"We are starting to get along and learning to respect each other." Annika answers, "Although there are some times when.....anyway, fortunately, Seven doesn't care much for the heat, so is not going to make an appearance while we are in the sauna."
Remember fitting yourself to the single-person comfy bubble, and finding a magical consolation in solitude?
Lackluster business efficiency, limited labor productivity, pathetic returns on investment and piling debt have haunted many State-owned firms. In particular, according to a government report presented to the National Assembly on November 1, 2010, 81 of 91 State-owned conglomerates and corporations incurred debt of about VND813.435 trillion. If Vinashin’s debt, which the Ministry of Finance puts at VND86 trillion, is included, State-owned enterprises’ debt as of late 2009 had been approximately 54.2% of that year’s GDP — even then, there are still nine corporations and conglomerates whose debt in 2009 remains uncertain and has therefore been excluded from the calculation. Again, these data shed light on the problems arising from dependence on State-owned enterprises for growth.
It took me many years to outgrow the 4-week course and to realise that there are ‘other options’. This is not to deny its power and its fitness for purpose, nor to feel less grateful for the incredible career it kick-started. But isn’t it time that some of the other options were given more credence? And more legitimacy?
Maybe you are a business exec or are employed at Dairy queen, you’ve a pay day.&nbsp America may be the area of business and the concept that you may need funds can now become more good when you work, a bank checking account plus a paycheck.&nbsp Loans are plentiful employing a limited-term cash advance Loan.&nbsp Depending on the report that that you dwell, on the internet payday Loans can be purchased from Bucks250 around Bucks1,000 and they are put into the account as part of your bank checking account by another day.
However, I also believe that there is absolutely a connection between some vaccines and the fact that 1 out of every 150 of our children is now being diagnosed with some form of Autism. So, like I said, a very sharp double edged sword that cuts both ways.
A Beautiful Look at Pinterest From Expat Travel Writer Christine Gilbert
Until then I will continue to use my stove top, my whisk and my wooden spoon.
A few images started projecting on the wall. I was startled. All those pictures were of Damon and I. I stared at her blankly.
This week is going to be spent looking for a replacement and working out a budget to afford it.!!!
I also used the 100% Sweetness stamp set by My Creative Time for the sentiments and corner heart stamps on my card. If you would like to check out the fun stamp sets Emma has available for purchase, click HERE.
chicken for lunch,
Richard Scalettar — Professor of Physics
And yes, I'll be paying tribute to the late, great Levon Helm on the SF Opry Friday.
As I walked into the show floor, fellow guild members from 2 guilds and friends from the Country Quilter Retreat gang, came up offering their congratulations. I thanked them all, but still didn't know what for. The first quilt I saw was "In the Spotlight" with it's 2nd Place ribbon in the Appliqued Wallhanging - Human/Animal category and I was so happy. It got an "Honorable Mention" last month at the Empire Quilter's show. Then I turned the corner and to my surprise, there was "Mis Hijos" the portrait quilt of my children from a workshop with Bisa Butler and it received "Honorable Mention" in the small quilts category. I was soo happy...:-) 2 ribbons, just like last years show!! Well I continued through the show and I was stopped in my tracks..... there was "In a Blaze of Glory" with a 3rd place ribbon in the Appliqued Wallhanging category!!!
So now we have that bottom container with the two side stakes and 2 horizontal bamboos. Next I would fill it half way up with compost and then sink 2 open bottomed plant pots into the compost. Fill the plant pots with compost and put 1 Tomato plant in each pot - perfect Tomato grower and light enough to move around as needed.
09/21/2011 SELL 0.01 usdcad 0.99709 02/03/2012 0.99342 +5.43
Hershey Kisses or Hugs (unwrapped)
It's a surprise birthday party for Korin Sutherland,
Saw the Avengers yesterday, it had me with a big smile on my face the whole time. Lots of cool stuff, extremely watchable all through, classic Hollywood pacing (which meant I knew when it was safe to take 2 minutes to go to the bathroom), and a big-ass set piece to finish it all off. Joss hit it out of the park just like I hoped he would and after the 15 years he’s had of struggling with studio execs I’m hoping he can do pretty much what he wants for the next few years. I’d love to see him infuse his next superhero movie with even more feeling.
You don’t have to have a blog to play along with the sketch challenge. If you upload your project to any on-line galleries or forums, please use the keyword of WMSC48.
Breaking the mold
And we’re down to the dozens, and this is why…
16. No. 16 In G Minor 1:27
The real question is – could people possibly lose their jobs due to visible tattoos?
Since we had a busy week getting ready for our birthday festivities, this picture is from the archives. For some reason there is often various construction equipment parked not too far from our house. I let my son climb up on this one so I could take his picture. The pictures I loved best was when I caught his reflection in the truck's mirror.
Below is my finished product!
And the main reason for blogging about this is to appeal for money. The CTS will sell the booklets in parishes and bookshops, but the copies distributed by Ten Ten in their school work will be given away free of charge. Ten Ten are nowhere near their target of £3,500. If you have a heart for this kind of outreach, and an appreciation of how much support and encouragement parents need, please do think of donating something to the Ten Ten fund.
Some people are tut-tutting because the couple had unprotected sex when they barely knew each other. They forget that Hugh has STD check-ups as frequently as most porn stars. As for Miss Hong, she may well have been a virgin who was saving herself for Hugh. Ludicrous though it may seem, people in the Far East actually revere him as the epitome of an English gentleman. One hopes he deflowered Miss Hong with the delicacy she would have anticipated.
Intense, unstable, and conflicted close relationships, marked by mistrust, neediness, and anxious preoccupation with real or imagined abandonment; close relationships often viewed in extremes of idealization and devaluation and alternating between over involvement and withdrawal.
One More Tip:
Regular readers of this blog may recall that I have previously written about the Rothschilds, an international banking family whose wealth is said to be measured in the trillions of dollars. Intrigued by what I had discovered about this powerful dynasty, I investigated further and discovered that Lord Victor Rothschild was thought to be the unidentified fifth member of the Cambridge Spy known by the KGB as the 'magnificent five'.
Belief in thepower of God, plus enough willingness, honesty, and humility to establish and maintain a new order of things were the essential REQUIREMENTS. Simple, but not easy. A price had to be paid. It meant the destruction of self-centeredness. I must turn in all things to the Father of Light who presides over us all. (A.A. Page 13, 14)
“That’s what first attracted me,” says Thomas de Wesselow, an engagingly serious 40-year-old Cambridge academic. “I’ve always loved a mystery ever since I was a boy.” And so he became the latest in a long line to abandon everything to try to solve the riddle of the Shroud.
It was quite a cosmic set-up. Devotees of the church revered the sanyasis, the senior monks and nuns of the order. Of course they revered the ideal that we represented, but it was a little too easy to go along with the unspoken charade of being somehow separate and higher than the rest of the world. A seductive kind of spiritual arrogance would creep in. Try as one might to remain humble and to be authentic and real, the power of group-think and the tidal pull of living in close community with those who thought along the same lines made it difficult to think and act differently. In other words, the voice of the community and the role of monastic would more often than not overshadow and overpower the voice of my own heart, which was sublimated to such a degree that I came to consider body, mind and even my heart as a kind of enemy, something not to be trusted.
The same technique is used in the preparation of other Liguria’ specialties such as salsa di noci (walnut sauce), which I particularly love. I will share that recipe at a later time.
It's obvious that Amin is parroting back things that his father has said, but the dialogue, despite its casual delivery — and Amin gives a great, relaxed, naturalistic performance — also feels very much written, putting into this boy's mouth the kinds of things that are said about independent, thinking women in this culture. The rest of the film will further explore various attitudes about women in Iran, but right here at the start Kiarostami is establishing the dominant male perspective that women should be subservient and domestically oriented, a perspective that's apparently passed on from fathers to sons.
Event Deadline: 13 November 2011
Like an evil blind hags
4) Finding a Home for Oklahoma’s Orphans While not everyone is called to foster or adopt, every follower of Christ is called to bring justice to orphans and can do something to change the outcome for these kids.
I decided that I had to run to the grocery store to buy soup for the restaurant, but while I was there, I realized that I was missing my bowtie. Suddenly I wasn't in the grocery store anymore, but I was at the mall trying to find a bowtie so I could go back to work and take care of my tables. I was running from store to store in the mall, freaking out that I had tables who were impatiently waiting for me and I couldn't go back until I found a stupid bowtie. (Yes, I know it makes perfect sense to leave your job in the middle of a shift to go shopping for formalwear.)
5. Born God And Aware
Although you you can't really see it in these photos I actually cut all the circles out of the white cardstock with a craft knife and then stuck pieces of patterned paper from the 6x6 paper pad behind the circles. You can see it quite clearly in real life and I think it looks much nicer than if I had of just cut the circles and stuck them on but then I am a sucker for punishment! The fab stitching stamp I used in between the circles is from an old set of Hero Arts stamps that has a load of different stitch stamps.
again - pouring fast over ridges of air,
MUSEUM OF THIEVES is the first book in a new MG fantasy series. In the city of Jewel, all children below the age of 16 are tethered to their parents and the Blessed Guardians at all times. That might suit some children just fine, but when the 1st annual Separation Ceremony (where children become no longer bound by silver chains) where the Separation age was promised to be lowered to 12 is stopped, Goldie Roth runs away in frustration. With nowhere else and no one else to turn to, Goldie is drawn to the museum as shadows lurk in the dark. As she learns the secrets of the museum, trouble is brewing in the city, and the museum is in danger.
Love this time of year.
My day started with all the excitment and joy in my heart. So that, obviously, woke me up. It got me prepared as early as never before belived upon. Every person that was awake in the household told me that I was really, really excited. Which I was! Who wasn’t going to be excited with their firsts?! Since I was prepared, I waited for mom to wake up, so I could practice the piano.
Storing supplies is one thing - crafting a creative ambiance is another. I like to tuck in unexpected notions with my supplies for little bits of unexpected inspiration. Antique photos and orphaned pages from a vintage book are nestled in a box of tea-stained ribbon...
As every line falls so effuse
“It was all the more difficult for me because I had two children from a previous relationship.”
The angry cob and his mate were plucked from their nest on the River Cam and whisked off to a secret location 60 miles away last week.
Malik is not as attractive as first expected.
However, if home sales continue to slide and home inventory builds, buyers may find themselves with an edge in negotiations.
Thanks so much for visiting, I love hearing from you!
or at least change the locks and not give them the keys."
Tickets @ www.tikibaroc.com
"Two things, actually," I told him. "Could you please tell that phony cripple in the wheelchair begging over there in the middle of Van Ness Avenue to stop tearing up all the shrubbery in the neighborhood looking for hidden drug stashes?"
In 1953, South Korea was a ruin. Three years of war between Communist forces (North Korean and then Chinese) and the Allied forces had seen Seoul switch hands four times, millions of people killed, millions more forced to flee their homes as refugees, massive infrastructural damage throughout the country, and the entrenchment of a partition line across the Korean peninsula which has split families up to this very day and inflicted unspeakable trauma on the Korean people as a whole. This devastating war started in 1950, only five years after the Korean peninsula (and therefore the whole of what would later become South Korea as well) had been liberated from an exceptionally brutal 35-year Japanese occupation which had inflicted massive violence, oppression, and suffering.
More importantly soft water is better for your skin and Aquatec have had reports from customers who have seen improvements in skin conditions such as eczema and psoriasis once they have softened their water.
On the 'Debate Team' paper there were these cute sayings on them. Well, with how 'brilliant' the glasses make me look, I just had to cut that one out and use it! The edges where inked with Tim Holtz's distress stains in black soot and brushed corduroy. I hope you all enjoyed this. Now (since I finally have my box of goodies) I can go create some more!
So there ya go.
On this question, as with some others, I had to ask if there was a third option, a mixed opinion. The questions seemed designed to create stark opposition.
Enjoying God's Good Earth! Fondly Meg
think about the future you
I made these last Monday morning just before 8 AM. Maybe you can see there was a little snow on the roofs.
Xlibris offer seven different packages;
These holidays have gone toooo fast.. Easter break seemed to take forever but then all of a sudden I only had a few days to squeeze in a visit to mum and dad's in Dunsborough and tonight is a school night lol!!! Back to a routine I hope..... but only if the above happens I guess otherwise I will be juggling a whole lot more!!!
The dignity of the human race is blind to economic, or any other kind of status. Financially poor human beings of planet Earth have the exact same amount of dignity as human beings who find themselves richer in terms of financial wealth. Human beings who have more buttons, or beads, or animals, or cars, or flowers, or boxes, or shoes, or clothes, or vacations, or food, or houses, or boats, or motorcycles, or anything else they can think of, have just as much dignity as those who do not.
I have chosen the theme of
Not to be missed, in Mongkok (Kowloon side) there is the Bird Markets, Flower Markets and the tropical Fish Markets (a whole street full of shops selling tropical fish) all around Prince Edward Station. Wandering this area is a fantastic day of sightseeing - its one of my favourite parts of Hong Kong. Apparently it’s one of the most densely populated places on earth so you can see why there’s so much hustle and bustle. While you're in the area walk down Nathan Road through Mongkok, there are a few markets including the Ladies and Temple Street Markets that are interesting, although often pretty junky selling fakes but often good for a laugh. I would also recommend heading to the Jade Markets in Mongkok, there is good selection of really pretty Jade and also other jewellery made from lots of different stones. Remember to bargain ruthlessly when at these places. Head to One Dim Sum near Prince Edward Station for cheap and cheerful Dim Sum if you're peckish.
“Well, umm,” Jack said slowly trying to think of a way to break the news, “this is going to be complicated.”
Anyway, I answered the 20 questions and here is my results...
“I always assumed that, where the Sith were involved, everything was personal,” Nik said.
I must have been driving at over 150km/hr when I approached an intersection in wuse 2, around Ecwa church, instead of reducing acceleration and then honking so as to warn other road users coming from different directions, I tapped the horn twice and I saw it…. Two oval shaped headlights heading in my direction, I tried to slow down so as to steer clear of the intending car but it was too little too late, so I watched in slow motion as this car slammed into the driver side of my car at breakneck speed..contrary to belief that such deaths happen so fast that the victims hardly know what hit em. They were wrong, as I saw it all in slow motion…It was as if the angel of death was playing cruel jokes on me, more like he was tapping the slow motion button on the DVD remote control
On the score of my musical talents (or lack of them), so far I have tried to learn the piano, violin, sang in a choir (apparently my rhythm was good), played (very badly) the bag pipes and now the guitar… Maybe I should be handing out merit points to those who are game enough to put up with my musical tormenting (something akin to waterboarding).
I cannot emphasize how batshit gorram loco this is.
There are going to be less officers to deal with these ‘pressing issues’ and more are going to be standing their ground. For example there was a Grade A domestic, where a female was heard to be screaming and someone had rung it in. Officers were called up but the unit was on a meal break, the next unit was doing ‘paperwork’ and so a unit from another area had to come across. Officers were actually saying ‘No’ (not directly but basically) There was a time when everyone would call up, back up and deal, but now they are starting to dig their heels in- it is fair to say they are ‘pissed off’, and really who can blame them, now having to work out their own hours which are applicable for their ‘unsociable hours’, get it checked and signed off and send it in. Ridiculous.
cleaning for you -- maybe even your child! :-)
Hope you had a lovely weekend, hope you had a great Mother's Day too!
Why am I not surprised that Iason Mink is the type of guy that likes to make his lovers/Pets cry in bed? Serves Riki right for talking all big and not being able to back it up.
Fear plays a major role in the life of Animists. They see the world as full of spirits, omens, spells and forces. Through magic, divination and sacred rituals, they seek protection to appease the gods, the spirits and the ancestors. They observe numerous taboos and prohibitions and observe sacred places. For example, in Haiti there is a sacred tree where a pact with the devil was signed over two centuries ago by witchdoctors. Animists see a whole host of objects as sacred things with sacred power. They recognize sacred persons and observe sacred actions. One of these is the circumcision rituals on young men in the Xhosa tribe. Many hundreds of men have died from these dangerous circumcision rituals.
However, the prime minister said the adjustment formula would only be implemented if the retail price of petrol was less than RM2.70 per litre. Otherwise the price would be capped at that.
In the zero substation of bounded-unbounded space the rhododendrons are red purple and pink
The US is apprehensive about anti-US sentiments not just in Northern Nigeria, but also in Chad and Cameroun – countries where US protects major investments and Boko Haram poses a major potential threat. Chad Basin and Chad Republic have always been potential sources of oil.
I was offered the opportunity of proving this last week.
Please check for the customer reviews of MBM 87M Tabletop Friction Folder, Speed 7,200 sheets/hour, 2 fold speeds (100 or 120 sheets per minute), Automatic stop when last sheet is folded at the merchant’s website by click on the link below.
I think the 'casing' elements are pretty obvious when you look at Laurie's card...! I used the same colour combo, vintage feel, embossed label, pink flowers, lace... maybe I should list the things I did differently lol!
Today is my birthday - yay for being 28! I've been sick so I've had zero time to put together a post. Please just enjoy these pics of Lancome's Rouge In Love High Potency Lipcolor in the shade Corail In Love.
to lacerate the back of men who staggered to their graves.
1/2 yellow, orange or red bell pepper, seeded and sliced
but because God is there for all of us.
"This is the first demonstration that lung stem cell niches may be altered in CF," Engelhardt said.
You can continue your shit, eating dog testicles and penis, even tiger penis for you rich wannashow, you can continue all this thinking you’re the upcomming force. You’re nothing.
James:
Wallace, from Street And City Photos emailed me a lovely little note today, and it prompted me to look around his blog. Fantastic stuff! I love the realness of the subjects, how they're not perfect human specimens, not all of a single age group or gender, or adherents to a particular style. They're just interesting to look at, or have some quality that makes them stand out... And of course, the interesting people aren't just awesome subjects without a really good photographer behind the lens!
I have to preface this by saying I am a Jane Austen girl through and through. You know this if you know me. I have had debates about the appeal of Mr. Darcy compared to Mr. Rochester. Let me just say this right now: Toby Stephens is a close second to Mr. D in this version. There are a few scenes that SMOLDER! I am not kidding! I watched the entire thing on YouTube because DANG Netflix didn't have it, and still loved it! It's one I am going to have to own. I also finished reading JA right about this time, so it was nice to have it fresh on my mind. Great book, great movie version! WHEW!
Just a word about supplies purchased here. When we sold eggs, we needed equipment that held up, and was easy to clean. We ordered these items mail order, and have owned, used and abused them for 12 years. None of these cost anymore than the feed store counterparts and still have a lot of life left in them. The feeder is a Kuhl range feeder w/o rain shield, the nest box is a ”Kuhl 10-hole with closable perches and removable plastic nest bottoms, and the waterer is a Plasson bell waterer.
3) I'm searching for a Bible reading plan. Not planning on speeding through the whole thing in a year. Just taking it slow and hopefully digging in. Any thoughts on that one?
Like so many in the Bay Area, Rachel and her family rent their house. This configuration allows everything to be easily be dismantled and used in a different way if they move. The shelf units can be stacked and put into closets and the baskets can be used anywhere in a new house.
A short, violently turbulent flight would have been preferable to this USAirways hell. Needless to say no more than three employees told me I was insane to fly the airline and that they were only there for the pension. The customer relations person I’m working with to get my refund asked why I didn’t fly British Airways.
Distress Inks, Perfect Pearls, Archival Ink & Art Institute Glue from Craft-Room
There are several problems with seeing QE as the be all and end all for metal prices.
These are incredible back-to-back actions – working in behalf of the bankers who wrecked the world economy and then voting to withhold help from families impoverished by the bankers’ criminal incompetence. You’d think the constituents of some of these senators would catch on, but con men like Saxby Chambliss of Georgia take it for granted that they can get away with murder, and they do. All they have to do is lie about it. Sure, the mass media will also report what the liars’ adversaries say about an issue, but the two sides will be presented as though they’re both valid arguments even in instances when two minutes of Google research would expose the unassailable truth.
I reach back to her and grab this long ass, brown hair that had already wrapped around her tongue, from her mouth. I actually had to stop the car and help her remove the hair from her throat.
"A Blaze of Glory!"
So this is it. Keeping in mind that everything we brought in for staging had to go back out, we kept furniture and accessories to a minimum. Hopefully just enough so that buyers can visualize how nice their furnishings will look.
Well it is already the end of August and we are getting into the Fall season. I love the Fall time with leaves falling, color changing and the smell of fireplaces going. I love the temp. I am not a heat person I love 70's degree weather. I love the starting of the holiday season. this is why I am writing my blog today. My daughter in law who passed 4 years ago this month loved this time of the year. She came from Calif. and never saw the changing that happen in the months ahead of us. But she started her holiday season decorating around Sept. and kept it up till after December. This is for her my Maria. She was one in a million. She gave us a wonderful gift our grandson Nick and kept her house in tack with such love and devotion. She kept her home so clean and was always decorating somewhere or something. She collected Radko ornaments for her several trees she put up. She would change things around all the time.
Another key document cited in the Spanish case is a November 2002 "action memo" written by Haynes, in which he recommends that Rumsfeld give "blanket approval" to 15 forms of aggressive interrogation, including stress positions, isolation, hooding, 20-hour interrogations and nudity. Rumsfeld approved the document.
The latest stop on the year long adventure was the Grand Ole Opry, the largest country and western club in the UK. It's a fantastic but very rarely used venue for gigs in Glasgow and located in a part of the city over in the south-west which in places hasn't changed since the 60s or 70s. There's no better illustration of this than our rendezvous for the pre-gig drinks...a pub called The Old Toll Bar...a pub for which the word traditional may very well have been invented.
All playoffs come with stars but this series really has it all. Henrik Lundqvist, the do it all goalie who was on the cover of Sports Illustrated and is single handedly one of the reasons the Rangers are in the playoffs. Chris Kreider, the lovable rookie who just turned 21 this week and continues to help the Rangers when he is most needed. Ryan Callahan, the captain who always seems to come through in the clutch. The Caps have Alex Ovechkin. While he hasn’t been as dominant as of late, he has the ability to heat up and really bring it.
Why did God do this for us? Because he loves us. That’s it!
4. Dark Sun
Write common sight word on the blocks
07. Lowdown In The Street – 2:49
This year will see a continued commitment to creating DVD documentaries for Redlands High School by the Digital Dogz. Last year we sold close to 150 Graduation DVDs making it even more successful than the Football DVD, and raising a significant amount of income for the Digital Dogz that we plan on putting to good use. The Friday Show will also return as a weekly positive reflection of life on campus.
athame making it her own. Now she was skyclad, having tossed her clothes off
There's things everyone who decides to use a firearm for self-defense needs to think about, consider, re-think, and continually process. It kind of reminds me of the ol' Kenny Roger's song, The Gambler...
Then, I became disabled for any real work, and Josh returned. He would either ask me or come right out and tell me what projects I needed help with, and then he would do them. Sometimes, he would mow the grass or rake the leaves without even letting me know (of course, I figured it out when I heard the mower), and he always seemed to do them right when I needed help the most. Other times, I would do a job alone that Josh had told me I needed help with, and he would get mad when he found out. Only he wouldn’t tell me he was mad; he would tell his mother, and she would pass it along. Then I’d start thinking about how I might get back on Josh’s good side. This was never hard because I don’t think he has it in him to hold a grudge against a friend.
Tomy Bewick (TB): The bookings between London, Guelph and Burlington started approximately two years ago, while the three slams were completing their own first years of regular events.
Now here is where it gets interesting. The Eskenazis did not actually *pay* for their stake in YPF. The terms of the crooked deal struck by the equally Jew-ridden government which brokered the original deal between the Spanish oil company and the then-floundering YPF - which was completely broke and so corrupt and inefficient that it could not even finance new exploration despite Argentina's abundant oil and gas resources - insisted that Repsol buy the shares on behalf of the Jewish Eskenazis which they would then pay for out of their share of future income streams! Have you ever heard of such a deal?
Middle: No, they come from the bits.
The North has a long history of terrorist attacks against the South, including attempts to assassinate South Korean presidents.
PRIZE 6 - One $30 Gift Voucher from Whimsy Stamps
It is this sight that truly fills my cup.
It's because... living in the shadow of love
How To Use :
There is so much wrong here that it is difficult to know where to begin. So let's start at the beginning.
Hi Friends, Wanted to Share with you all a Couple of Cards that my Little Grand Children made for their Mommy. (Which is my Daughter).
I've also been working on my blog. I'm not a computer girl at all so learning new things on here takes me a very long time. I'm finding it easier to learn new things on blogger than I can on Facebook. I usually think about it for a long time before I have the courage to try it. I've wanted to create "Pages" on my blog to make it easier for everyone to find whatever your looking for. This will be a work in progress for awhile. Hopefully this will make it easier for you to contact me, look thru layouts and cards, you can also see upcoming workshops and crops and for those that would like to, you can also shop from my CTMH site. If you would like to hold a CTMH party or an online party you can also contact me. If you have any suggestions, ideas or things that you would like to see changed please let me know. You can comment here or email me at papermemories4u@yahoo.com.
Are you one of those people who still feels a nostalgic desire to keep the penny around? Don’t get me wrong… there is a lot to be said for nostalgia. I’m one of those relics who can actually remember buying penny candy as a child and looking forward to having some coins. But times have changed. I actually saw a gumball machine this week that took quarters, and the gumballs were not particularly large. So is it time to get rid of the penny?
“You whacked the teen that was on top of Ralph with the plastic bat. Both those teens were on you in seconds and they beat and kicked you mercilessly while little, big-mouth Ralph ran away.” Piper let silence fall for a few moments as he considered the boy in front of him.
And gave me food to eat
Let's start the session. Now what would a shrink ask me if I were in one's office? I think the first question would be "What upsets you?" My answer: My f****** thesis!
Once upon a time there was a kingdom with a castle…
This is what took place on Black Thursday, May 7, in Ipoh. The State Assembly Speaker, V Sivakumar, was removed forcibly from his seat and dragged out of the State Assembly. A new Speaker, R Ganesan, was installed by the BN State representatives. The scuffle caused damage to the speaker’s chair, and great offence to the dignity of the Perak State Assembly.
You’ve got to remember there are 800 US military bases around the world.
The move comes after Tesco announced a £1 billion investment in its UK business to revive its flagging domestic operation.
That sounds like a great solution, until one considers the fact that a giant, orbital mirror is not far off from being a super-weapon the likes of which Dr. No would have given a body part to have owned. Any dastardly evil villain would love something like that. And other nations would basically object to the sudden weaponization of space, making it a very complicated situation. Who decides who gets to affect the entire planet with one device? And who is responsible if it goes wrong with unintended consequences? All these thoughts planted the seed for a piece of my latest book, Arctic Rising, which looks at the many complications and ins and outs of climate change from the perspective of a thriller.
“But, Dele, he is just a child” my mother would say
Be still, my heart!
In a medium-sized bowl, mix the dry ingredients listed above. Add to the ugly apple mixture until everything is nice 'n' moist.
Between sorting and editing photos, we’ve had internet problems. Then I got a new laptop and a new photo editing program! eek! The learning curve is back! Thank you for your patience with me!
In fricassee
(me on Christmas getting my Cricut)
By Angela Peregoff
I decided to jump on the chalk paint bandwagon that I have read so much about in blogland. Of course, I made my own. Cheap, remember? I used this recipe, and it seemed to work just fine. I did fill in chips and lightly sand every part that was getting painted, but I did not prime, and I used wax instead of a poly coat. I have to say that I really like the feel of the finish and I will probably never do a poly coat again (unless it's kitchen cabinets).
What I have never understood is why a British patriot would be so into German Nazism, and the way the Nazis did things, in the first place. The British have their own ways of doing things. The German National Socialists, who were of a specific historical period (1921-1945), had their own very German way of doing things. What’s British about German National Socialism? Why do British Nazis want to mimic German Nazis? This is like Pakistani Muslim youths in Keighley and Bradford parroting Bronx blacks.
Do you still have family back in Kankakee and go back there?
whitewater cascades
they were on the chandeliers,
The Pamodzi deal was the first large empowerment deal to be financed by the Land Bank — and was questioned by the bank’s own auditors, Ernst & Young, the Sunday Times has established.
So I get nudie in the closet. Then on the other side of the closet is another door that another nurse opens whether you're ready or not.
AdriN2001: And this night, we got real drunk, and went into the woods, and the world, it just touched us, it grabbed him, and we came back to my apartment and kissed a little but it wasn't anything much--but there was this feeling, and this knowledge, and we just knew
I’m just trying to make a point that it’s silly to ask a vegan how they get their protein. I always explain that my mom raised us on a vegetarian based diet, and thus I’ve always been conscious of what is necessary to fill out a well-rounded diet, and how to get those necessary things. I would love to eat only french fries all day. Not the best idea.
I retreated to regroup my senses and work out what to do next. Naturally, my first concern was for that of the birds' welfare. However, on inspection I found that they all seemed well and remarkably slick-free. I imagine that the explosion was so violent that it didn't even get a chance to cling to any feathers. As a precaution, they all got a bum wash regardless. This wasn't greeted with any enthusiasm, and Mabel was particularly aggrieved. Considering that this was her second bath in a month, perhaps she had the right to squawk indignantly throughout. Once the hens were dealt with, I braced myself to return to the scene of the crime.
We want to always show you the pure & hopeful songs~!
Theist: So is this one. Did you hear about the dyslexic atheist who said There is no dog!?
thin sliced yellow onion
because you don't know what to do with it.
The monologue is delivered by a character who thinks of himself as The World’s No 1 Stewart Lee Tribute Act and who interacts with the man behind the counter, through the glass, at the garage.
Constant urination is present throughout pregnancy. At two months of pregnancy, I was going to the restroom about seven times a day. In the months to follow this became less frequent. During my last trimester, the urge to go to constantly go to the restroom returned.
ok, yes, you can remind me about all of this when i start complaining about the renewal of the patriot act! but no matter what, it still nothing like living in deepestdarkestafrica!
And everyone grew quiet,
Can you imagine dressing like this to sit on the shore and read a book?
offered for discussion/ not offered for discussion
Do you use your own children or any others as a ‘sounding board’ for your novels?
Papers: Old phone book pages, Jillibean Soup, Provocraft, Basic Grey
I already know God's got His hand on You
Special mention to Uncle Dave who is recovering from knee surgery. I was going to ask him if he wanted to dance as well. Get well soon, Uncle Dave.
I do not want to go to exotic places on the globe.
I am currently finishing up my capstone project in school. And by finishing, I mean, I've barely started and there are only a few weeks left. However, my function in this aim is to develop and design a brewery. Unbeknown to most, I have no intentions of presenting any work nor having anything significant on D-Day. However, I do plan on having a solid document of information channeling what the brewery (or now, moreover, Brew Pub), is going to look like and effectively, live up to (although June says this will change and I am in firm belief with him that it will, however it is necessary to have a place to start), in hopes of sharing this information with potential investors in the process known as making DaveDave REAL.
See? It can be funny and yet heartfelt.
The normal settings fоr а computer uѕing аn operating system that іs popular include thе hard drive space neеdѕ to be sufficient. The space for this normal requirement іѕ twenty fіvе gigabytes оf space. In the ultra settings it iѕ the sаme vаlue for hard drive storage space requirements.
Mors explained in barely-accented English that they'd heard about unschooling while studying human media as they reentered the Solar System and his generation found the idea fascinating, although it was anathema to his parent's generation.
He would just keep building the great wall between them.
But early Sunday morning I was watching MSNBC’s Up With Chris Hayes and they played a clip of Mr. Romney back in January on stage and telling a conservative audience that he believed that a mother with a child as young as two years old should be forced to go outside the home and work for a living in order to earn some social dignity. He said that his statement might sound harsh but he was willing to have the government pay more in order to supplement a welfare program to separate a child from his or her mother rather than pay less and leave the child’s rearing to the mother, the one person more than any other who we believe will work hardest to keep the child safe and to watch out for their well being. It might sound harsh, but Mr. Romney is willing to pay more to put the child at a higher risk of something happening to it.
Then I ride and we are making great progress in some areas and encountering blocks in other areas. The trot work, which needed the most improvement, is going well. He's becoming more forward and supple. We do a circle at each end and when we've warmed up with that for a bit we do three loop serpentines. The serpentines really help with getting the 'flow' of switching bend and keeping rhythm through turns. I'm pleased with our progress here. Rogo is really improving use of his hindquarters and at times booms down the long sides. I look forward to the day when this power is there most of the time and carries through the corners rhythmically.
Tirosh-Becker also publishes a large number of quotations from the previously-lost Mekhilta of Rabbi Shimon b. Yohai. This is a real find, and the author promises an article soon with Menahem Kahana on their value (see pp. 112-115 for a discussion, and pp. 856-882 for the quotations). There is a disproportionately large amount of quotations from this Mekhilta in the corpus, pointing to its prominence in Babylonia (indeed, the Mekhilta of Rabbi Ishmael was sometimes called “the Palestinian Mekhilta”). Many of these quotations are from parts of the Mekhilta not attested in known Genizah fragments, and were reconstructed from the fourteenth century Yemenite Midrash Hagadol twice: by D. Z. Hoffmann, and by J. N. Epstein. The latter was more conservative in his reconstructions, but several quotations discovered by Tirosh-Becker actually support Hoffmann’s more extensive reconstructions. However, these quotations, as far as I could see, are not marked in any way as derived from the Mekhilta, and in some cases (see e.g. pp. 859, 860-862) I’m curious why the author thinks they are from this work and not simply from one of the Talmuds, which contain similar material.
up. I have nine of these letters from this officer to his wife. Some of them expressing how lonely he
The "city purse" needs to hug close to my body when I'm digging through bins at my favorite GW Outlet, or trying on shoes at the Nordstrom Rack; and it needed to distribute weight evenly when I'm walking downtown.
Whatever the case may very well be…graffiti is here to stay whether you like it or not.
Her unhappiness, or frustration, was a very subtle subplot in the movie but very well delivered by JoBeth. The oldest child, Dana, was an unruly 16-year old teenager flirting with construction workers on her way to school. (Do the math! Can you say, “Shot gun wedding”?) Robbie, the middle child, was constantly taunting both his older and younger siblings. The point of highlighting this familial grief was to accentuate Diane’s coming full-circle with embracing and fully accepting family life and motherhood when Carol Anne was sucked into her closet and trapped in some sort of netherworld, only being able to communicate through the static of an un-aired channel on the television. (Thank goodness they didn’t have satellite!)
"Soooo-zan"
Two thumbs up.
The man appeared to be one of Madikizela-Mandela's bodyguards. He bumped Odendaal against the chest, according to Odendaal.
12 brussel sprouts, halved
“Is it the fear of losing in the next general election that makes it so difficult for Najib and UMNO to take heed for electoral reforms?” asked a university student who took part in the rally. “Is Bersih’s demand too much for Najib to chew?” “Is it because Umno fears tasting defeat in a general election if the electoral process is clean?” he added.
- 8 thin sliced skinless chicken breast cutlets, 3oz. each
from the teachings of my pastors that our attitude towards the negative events of our lives is ours alone to determine.
We had a little chat about the incident for a moment, but the odd thing was that as she was talking she didn’t look at me at all, but with her head up and smiling, addressed her remarks to an invisible person one foot to my right! It was most disconcerting!
first coat of paint on all the pieces, guess what happens? It starts sprinkling. Are you kidding me? I’d checked the forecast before and I didn’t see any rain. Why can’t those people just get the weather predictions right the first time! I’m pretty sure I looked like a deer in headlights when I turned to her and said “What do we do?” At least I imagine myself asking that. So the good news was that most of it was dry and it was the first coat so there was still time for damage control but who really wants to this when their on a time
Watch as the icy cold embers die, the fall of an empire. Watch as you find yourself falling off the balancing wire
Several years ago I booked an author who wrote books about self-defence and was notorious as the sort of man who could (and would) break someone's neck with his little finger. The shop filled up with shaven-headed, neckless men in their twenties and thirties who all seemed quite excited by the prospect of comparing notes about the best way to beat someone senseless.
We just celebrated Goldie's 3rd birthday. She certainly got the better end of the birthday deal. While she was busy licking icing and tearing open gifts, I began climbing Mt. Transition. Instead of snow, its covered in paperwork. I still haven't reached the top.
“We’ve seen the consequences of a government which is out of touch but how do political parties stay in touch? The conversation in your house, in your street, your neighbourhood is a conversation that the Labour Party is having too.
Add in some unbelievable winds, a little sunshine, and a range of temperatures from freezing to sweltering, and you have a description of our traveling experience.
To protect the interests of the working class it would be necessary to nationalise the banks and cancel the debt held by foreign big business and financial institutions, while protecting the savings of working people. It would also be necessary to take over the commanding heights of the economy (with minimum compensation on the basis of need) to ensure the supply of essential goods and services. Priority should be given to reconstructing public services such as health, education, etc. Control of the economy should be through bodies of democratically elected representatives from the trade unions, community organisations, and the wider public. On a capitalist basis there is no easy way out.
--When I'm in a space where I hear many disrespectful remarks, insults and slurs, I usually leave. If I can't, I find myself focusing my attention on women, people of color, and queer people in the space, hyper-aware of little things happening to them and silently imploring the crowd to leave them alone.
So if that is not worldview defense I would like to know what would be. It is worldview defense carried to the extent of an extreme mental pathology. So, as I have often previously remarked, Leftists are great projectors -- they attribute to others things that are really true of themselves. So to find out what is true of them, just listen to what they say about conservatives. Prof. P. was so alive to the phenomenon of worldview defense precisely because it fills the heads of many of his fellow Leftists -- and maybe even his own head.
Q: Do photos in a digital edition need the same caption as in the print edition?
Álbum: Tiger & the Duke (Re-Release)
2. I love anything and everything that is Disney.
'Morning Everyone,
These are my words
Are we in danger of becoming the next fad for the newly rich? After all craft beers, some of which are quite strong do tend to be sold at a premium because of the Govt's ridiculous duty rates on beers over 7.5% abv. Let's not forget all the tax we have to pay getting the beer into the country and the VAT rises that we're currently seeing.
One day I was walking home from work (notice I said walking, poor and NO car) I spotted by the dumpster a most lovely couch. (It had legs and every thing! I was in love! ) We were so excited for night to fall that night. (To get the couch-focus here)
Schneider KTM, Deckardt R. The implication of upright posture on pregnancy. J Perinatal Medicine 1991; 19: 121-131.
Michael Burry is the little boy in The Emperor’s New Clothes. Michael Lewis is Hans Christian Andersen.
When I lived in Corvallis, I lamented the dearth of local craft brewpub options. At that time there were two, neither really meeting the definition of a true brewpub: Oregon Trail Brewing at the Old World Deli and the, then new, McMenamins on Monroe. In the last few years however two exceptional brewpubs have opened: Block 15 (on which I waxed rhapsodic previously) and now Flat Tail Brewing.
- Canvas lining with an inside cell phone pocket and zip pocket
Place pan in center of oven and bake for 45 minutes. Check with a cake tester or skewer, or when cake begins to pull away from pan. I trust the skewer insert method over the touch method on this type of cake. When skewer comes out clean of crumbs (not sugary mixture) immediately remove from oven and invert on a cake platter. Tap top of pan or carefully bang plate on counter to loosen cake. Replace any stuck apples to the top of cake (hopefully, there will be few) and allow cake to cool at least an hour before serving.
Best wishes for Easter and Passover everyone!
“We hope that this technology would be emulated and followed by those who got Braodband Wireless Access (BWA) licenses,” he said at the launch event.
Am I being a whiner when I say the wine list comes up short? Available by the glass, we like, but the whites this day, for instance were limited to a pinot grigio and a pinot blanc.
Uncle Sam.
The HBG crew arrived later than normal this year - with the addition of per-ordained time slots, there's really not much reason to get there too early (though one gentleman set up shop at 3am). Although we were deep in the line, we knew what to expect, and things moved pretty quickly once the doors were opened. I was also well on my way at that point, thanks to our cooler bag and the help of the folks near us in line.
Months later she needs something to haul her out of her secluded depression. Moving across the country, and rejoining her old band Raptor Snatch seemed like the perfect idea.
Dinner: See tomorrow . . . . .
accompaniments are sautéed spinach and shoestring potatoes.
Isn’t she just a doll! How can some girls, just be born with so much black hair? Just like her mom and dad! She has two big sisters, and looks very similar to her sister that is closest to her in age. I took pictures of her on Saturday afternoon, with natural light, but I rather take pictures earlier in the day, as the sun isn’t as harsh and unpredictable. I have noticed a lot of variation in the pictures because of the light. I may just have to take a few more portraits, so I feel totally satisfied…and sneak a few of her big sisters in, too! Once again, this brand newborn, 1 week old, was checking out my camera! Even with the room heated, her session made her hungry, and wide awake! In years to come, better watch out Dad, the boys will be after her! She already is such a cutie!
...due to unforcast cold snap.
Artist solidarity.
I expected to break the first one by 4pm on Day 1, so I am feeling quite smug.
Cheekiness is to be expected from a bar called Naked for Satan, and we find plenty of it on the back wall in the upstairs dining area. It's a collage of both men and women in various states of undress, but it's more titillating than seedy.
Hat Leaf:
Will there be any other work involved:
The day it started booking on 2nd week of 2011, I might be among the first dozen customers who would have made the booking on Datawind’s website. The moment I entered details on the website, an acknowledgement email arrived. It had an order number, assurance of delivery within 2-3 weeks and cash on delivery. I thought, if it comes before Christmas, it will be a wonderful gift to the spouse.
Written and Credit to Susan Hu
-Booty danced with a random volunteer at a water stop. (With a gimpy leg, combined with the fact that I can't dance anyway!)
All hell broke loose (in honor of my dad)
The Calvert County Historical Society, Inc. was founded in 1953 by a small group of concerned Calvert County residents. On May 5, 1954, articles of incorporation were made part of the public record which stated that the main purpose of the Society was to further the collection of historical data and records concerned with Calvert County and other materials bearing on the history of the State and Nation, including private letters, documents, manuscripts, early events and acts as recorded in structures and works of public and private nature. From a newly established Headquarters Room on site at Linden, visitors can find a wealth of valuable early county history. Gifts to the Society over the years have been varied and interesting, and have made important contributions to the understanding of the uniqueness and richness of the County's history. The research library continues to grow in volume and diversity. Family papers describing first person accounts of historical events, wills, family Bibles, original manuscripts, photographs, published histories and a growing video library are but a small part of the collection. Portraits, pieces of furniture and artifacts have also been entrusted to the Society's care.
He came to Jesus at night and said to him,
LOCAL SLF: Decatur vendors the SLF will be branching off into a new Decatur Local Favorites Group and I encourage you all to get in on the ground floor here. Memberships are limited. We will be meeting May 22 at 6:00 so feel free to email me mail@sjanephotography.com for more information on how to get involved.
30 Chocolate Heaven Cupcakes later and we decided we would work along to the cliché of the kitchen being… “If you can’t stand the heat in the kitchen, get out” so we did!
Just leave me a comment here and say you would like to win. (Yes that simple!)
Beaded haloed head
One theory I’d like to examine is that the chicken farmers have bought the club to use as a short-term marketing tool to grow their business. With this in mind, is it suddenly slightly easier to see why Venky’s are cost-cutting at Rovers at every opportunity, investing instead in their poultry business?
4.) “That's not a thing any of us are granted. To go back. Wipe away what later doesn't suit us and make it the way we wish it. You just go on.” From Cold Mountain by Charles Frazier
Dilute with water down to a "tea" colour.....
"I really liked the way “Stay Focused Nikon D60” was organized by problems and solutions to those problems, rather than a step-by-step rundown of all the features. It groups the most common problems that people experience and puts them into different chapters. Each issue offers several different solutions depending on the specific conditions. For instance, a photo can be too dark for several different reasons and each one is fully explained with its individual solutions. The sample photos do a great job at illustrating both the problem and the fix. This makes it easy to jump around reading the items that pertain to your most pressing needs.
Percilla
Do something kind for your self and others and take the time to have a laugh!
But godliness with contentment is great gain.
And as for the zombies... Higson throws out some clues about them. What, we wonder, happens to the kids once they reach sixteen? What is it that made some diseased adults into flesh eaters, and others into, well, vacant shells of who they once were? What (arg spoiler I won't say it, I won't). Just be rest assured, Higson doesn't just use "and the grown ups got a disease, the end".
First of all: Internet Explorer
1247 - the number of water projects in progress or completed by 13 partner organizations and funded by charity: water as of January 19, 2009, in 14 countries including Ethiopia, Haiti, Honduras, India, Kenya, Malawi, and more. In case you don’t know by now, charity: water is a non profit organization bringing clean, safe drinking water to people in developing nations by funding sustainable clean water solutions in areas of greatest need.
A favourite early scene that takes place during Steve's rope learning period features Al Pacino asking Powers Boothe's "Hanky Salesman" about the handkerchiefs that are hanging in his shop. If I heard this right, a light blue hanky stuffed in your left back pocket means you like to receive oral sex, while a light blue hanky sticking out of your right back pocket indicates that you give oral sex. When it comes to green, the left back pocket signifies you're a hustler, and the right implies that you're a buyer. Moving on to yellow, the left is all about receiving golden showers, and the right means you give them. Just as he was about to explain what the colour red represents, Al's character bails. Which is a shame, because I was dying to know what the red hanky stood for. I'm gonna go ahead and assume that it had something to do with anal fisting. Anyway, like Steve, I was a little confused by the yellow hanky. And not by what constitutes a "golden shower" (people peeing on one another for erotic or malicious purposes goes back thousands of years), but by which pocket meant what.
THE ACCIDENTAL TOURIST (LAWRENCE KASDAN & FRANK GALATI)
The home we are buying, however, isn't in such great shape. Right now, you would probably go walk through it and think we were crazy, just insane for buying this house. It is one of those homes that when you read the description on the MLS listing it reads something like this. "Lots of potential! Needs some TLC. A fixer-upper! Handy-man special!" But the location and price are well worth putting some work into it to make it our own. We are looking at a project about the size of this one.
"You don't know? Do they feel ok???"
CF: Probably the biggest worry for me at the moment is that Series 2 will be as well received as Series 1. I got some really good reviews for Series 1 for which I was very grateful, and I am working my hardest to make sure that Series 2 is even better. As far as surprises go... that would be telling, but I can tell you that this is the year of the Trojan and that the Doctor’s hearts will be broken. The plot arc is a lot less subtle this time around, but should hopefully smack you clean between the eyes when all is revealed. This is also why the finale to this series runs to 3 parts instead of the traditional 2. Oh, and of course, nobody knows just what those pesky guardians of time are up to yet!
A wise doctor once told me that as long as I refuse to forgive my abuser(s), I’m connected to them. I’m spending energy on them. That’s the poison. If I’m holding on to the awful wrongs they did to me, I’m thinking about them, I’m letting their actions control my emotions, thus spending energy and keeping my connection with them strong.
On the bus, the girls meet a colorful character named Shonda. Caroline also calls Carvel “white trash ice cream”. Max tells Caroline a story about how her mom flaked on her 10th birthday, so she stole $20 from her purse and got herself an ice cream cake. In the prison, Max worries that they won’t be able to get in since they didn’t call ahead to be put on the list. Caroline tries to bribe the officer with $50, but he doesn’t budge. Max suggests the officer can feel her up if they can go through, and the officer allows it. After the full body search, Max and Caroline wait for Caroline’s dad. A one-night stand of Max’s named Irish, who’s a fellow prisoner, comes up to her and tells her he loves her. Max and Caroline try to tell him it was just a one nighter, but he gets angry and starts a fight with the guards. The fight causes the visiting hours to get cut, and Caroline only gets to see a glimpse of her dad before the guards rush her away. Max apologizes to Caroline and says she’s a terrible BFF, but Caroline says it’s fine. Max gets a Carvel cake for the “bang bus”. Caroline thanks Max because she got what she wanted for her birthday, to see her dad. The total for their cupcake shop is $625.
We understand that the contract for carrying the U.S. Mail, daily, from Spruce Creek to Curwensville, thro this place, has been awarded to Mr. Eder. It is to be carried in four horse coaches. This is something like treating us as being within the limits of the United States, and after the contract goes into operation, we may expect to hear the news of what is going on in the world with some regularity, and before it has become too stale to possess interest.
And blinking unnatural
today. I have seen his stuff. I really like his style.
Before you go though, I have one last thing. . . a giveaway!
Jk has a beautiful voice, but is often shy when singing by herself, even though when I led the Children’s Choir at our old church, she would sing solos and duets if I needed her to. Her Homeschool Director has been working on getting Jk to come out of her shell and have confidence in her abilities, and tonight I saw some of that confidence shine through. Jk loves to sing for Jesus, and I hear her all the time singing in her room, or in the shower, but I think that knowing that mom has a degree in music makes her feel that she won’t measure up, even though I often tell her that I think she has a beautiful voice but that her heart for Jesus makes it an amazing gift that she could use for the glory of God. She has often seen me sing in church and other things and I think she is afraid that she isn’t good enough. But she is, and so I have hoped being with another encouraging music teacher would let her see that she is good enough to share her gift with others and use it for God.
Is the answer to a never ending story...
"An individual, a group, a party, or a class that 'objectively' picks its nose while it watches men drunk with blood massacring defenceless people is condemned by history to rot and become worm-eaten while it is still alive".
- May assist with providing info for reports to HR vendor management services, client HR administration, and client managers and may provide feedback to vendor management on issues regarding interfaces of data.
Why? It’s not specific enough. You’ll never stick with it
Red beans and rice is a humble food. Not every homemaker out there will be able to convince their families that this meal is the most amazing food ever. Fortunately for me, my husband was raised in the South and this was a staple in his home as he was growing up. I have always loved beans so when my husband fondly recalled this dish I decided to give it a try and it has become one of our family favorites.
It's only 2:21PM...time to turn back to my promise: I will not be negative or raise negative children.
Or because of what they are capable of making you into? That they are inspiring, and encouraging, and kind and complementary to your personality such that when you're with them, you feel your life is moving forward and they move along with you.
Layne Johnson is my favorite illustrator. Farmer George Plants a Nation is spectacular with George Washington images. Christmas for a Kitten has one of the most perfect Santa faces I’ve ever seen in a picture book.
Grilled Asparagus
7: The Salvation Army
” I started the outreach with Judy from Stewardship In Action. I wanted her with me because I was new to the whole neighborly outreach process, plus, living in a rural area, my neighbors are pretty reserved. In fact, I had the longest conversation I have ever had with one set of neighbors because of this project; even though we have lived next to each other for years. They were happy to learn of the free plants and labor they would get through Stewardship in Action. The next neighbors, who also live on the creek, were worried that this project might infringe on their right to own horses on a creek. We assured them that it would not.
“Why are you being so difficult?” she asks. “Most girls would be grateful. At the very least excited.”
And I had a really nice time there.
Nothing is more unattractive to me than a woman who stalks my life. Liking my statuses on facebook, appearing in places where I check-in, having some opinion about my twitter tweets. Bitch, if I wanted a private investigator I’d call Inspector Gadget.
The gardens are on a formerly private estate, and they were the creation and vision of Eulalie Wagner. The gardens unfold in a series of “rooms” or nooks — a rhododendron path, open lawn, fern garden, tea house and cherry trees, pond, rock garden, knot garden, etc. At the center is the Wagner House, where visitors can enjoy a wisteria-covered veranda and peek into the elegant rooms on the ground floor.
Sun King Buffalo Fest (Barrel Aged Oktoberfest)
While children do not care about things like services, cable TV and telephone basic utilities, cable TV and telecom services, you do. Keeping your current service accounts can be profitable in terms of discounts, rebates and not having to pay for hookup charges US Promo Deals will help make this transition easier.
The relationship we have with food, extends to our relationship with fashion and huge pressures we feel to look good. Dressed in film-noir figure hugging black and finished with the most eye-dazzling ruby-red shoe wedges, the delicious Nigella Lawson took to the stage on the opening day of the Vogue Festival and chatted with Kirsty Young. Kirsty was equally stunning in a desirable floor length silk or chiffon floaty maxi in this season’s hot glamazon print.
My long-winded answer:
Refresh your ego:
Thanks for all your fabulous entries to our Wedding challenge. Today is THE big day for William and Kate and I am sure most of us will be following the proceedings on the telly ! We would like to wish them the very best of luck ,,,, not that they will read this !! :-)
It’s the same thing that is bringing California to its collectivist knees. Public unions. Education. That sort of thing.
The place sits at the top of a steep, wooded embankment and just over the road is a school which I once-upon-a-time attended.
His Word formed the world around us, and everyone in it. God spoke and in this is everything we know and can imagine, everything except for God Himself . . . and God gives us this communion through His Son, revealed as the Word. He is God’s communication to us.
“In that box.”
I know. its ridiculous. We are using different flowers than these because we aren't millionaires, and peonies in Oregon are like $35 a stem off season. But Chelsea has ordered garden roses in corals and hot pinks (garden roses are in general super petal-y and can often look like peonies, way more organic and sculptural than the ubiquitous rose) and a bunch of awesome weedy greens, dahlias, blackberries.
Anyway, the husband and my kiddos love pizza. I'm a fan, but I'm not a pizza monster like the three of them are. This sounded intriguing...pizza with no carbs in the crust? But I figured it was worth a try.
But instead of that we get arguments for an “Objective Moral Standard” and an “Objective Moral Law-giver”. Seriously – that’s gotta be a joke.
“I would not have given anyone $4,000 (deposit and rent) to stay somewhere, just to pick up and leave seven days later,” one of the plaintiffs tells the Asbury Park Press. “I would not have hired a moving truck, packed and unpacked, had my mother take off time from work to watch the kids. The whole idea was to get a nice, big home for the kids.
Today is my turn for a challenge,
Tao and Takeo awaken to see a weird scene. Inside of me, I’m laughing at their expressions, particularly Tao’s confused one. M-21 and Regis sighing because of Tao and Takeo…yeah, I can definitely see the partnership. M-21 and Regis really are good ‘together’ while Tao and Takeo are good ‘together’. And no, not that kind of ‘partnership’, you perverts.
Beer Style: American IPA
behind the smile
Matthew 16:24-26 (NLT)
. what caused it (negative paternalistic, past)
2. Amir Khan vs Timothy Bradley
Before that they sent me a message saying "drayton, thanks for joining our VIP list!" - which of course I never had - before explaining that their new scam will be the largest MLM launch online. Nice to know that besides ripping me off with some dodgy rubbish they're going to con me on some video deal.
Fran West
It may be noted that all the examples of conspicuously "caring" conservatives given above were also imperialistic or militaristic conservatives (generally both). This makes them somewhat unusual in the conservative tradition -- particularly in the American conservative tradition, which is isolationist rather than expansionist or aggressive. The basic conservative dictum: "You leave me alone and I will leave you alone" translates into an international policy of letting other nations go to hell in their own way as long as they don't threaten or attack America. So it has almost always been Democrat Presidents that have deployed American military power abroad on a large scale.
Red deer tongue lettuce (June?).
Ideally you have to eat this on the Chowpatty beach, watching the sea and the sun set while a warm breeze blows by. Soon after you finish this, you need to get yourself a chuski/ice lolly to cool you down. That is ideal, but it can be happily consumed anywhere in the world. Happy pao bhaji eating.
Grease a baking sheet, separate dough in half and form each half into an 8″ log about 1/2″ thick on the baking sheet. Bake for 20 minutes. Cut each log diagonally into at least 8 slices. Place slices cut side down on the baking sheet and bake for another 8 minutes. Flip pieces over and bake for 8 more minutes.
Talk about a timely sermon today. Pastor Gary definitely brought it today and it is something I need to remind myself at different times (I won't go into details, but thankful for the sermon).
As the boy lay in the mud looking up at the Lord his expression remained unchanged, displaying the same vacant, lethargic smile.
Carmen Molina and Dora Luz of Mexico
As a principal, I listened, awe-struck by our teachers’ insights and their openness to reflection and learning. As if looking into a mirror, rather than observing a peers’ classroom, our wonderings and questions reflected not sage guidance we could offer others, but thoughtful musings on how we could improve our own practice. At first I was quiet, too quiet, taking in classroom experiences through the lens of our teachers, amazed by how much more I can absorb when buttressed by the perspectives of teachers than I can on my own solitary daily classroom walkthroughs.
Help children to appreciate cultural diversity by comparing how Mother’s Day is celebrated in Spain with how we celebrate it in England. In Spain, Mother’s Day takes place on the first Sunday in May, rather than in March. They celebrate it in much same way as we do, with cards and presents.
Weishaupt’s Illuminati began humbly with only five members, but after a few years and with powerful connections, the Order became a major political force across the world. Influential deciders, rich industrials, powerful noblemen and mysterious occultists joined the Order and participated in its conspiratorial objectives. Some historians claim that the Order’s quick rise to success was due to a secret meeting between Weishaupt and a mysterious figure named Cagliostro, the most powerful occultist of the time.
add cream of tartar followed by caster sugar in at least 3 additions into egg whites while still beating
So I kinda feel like we’re forming a n00b godspouse network here, in a good way, and so we’re gonna do a diff post today on the blog. Revi is also a Loki spouse, and we have gotten some questions on spousery that we’re gonna talk about (and do keep in mind we’re both new, so philosophy may change as time goes on).
Landen Meadows is a community of single family homes built primarily in the 1990s. Charlotte NC’s Landen Meadows neighborhood is located in the Ballantyne area of South Charlotte NC between Ardrey Kell Rd and Rea Rd, minutes from the Blakeney shopping center. The Landen Meadows neighborhood features a community pool, playground and tennis courts.
Is the ‘doer’ a mere appendage to the action? Should I (do I?) define myself through my acts?
Pynchon's Gravity
For those of you who don’t know, on December 10th we were playing our biggest rival, Yorktown. I subbed into the game early in the first quarter and made it two or three times down the floor, but on the fourth time I had a terrible accident. I went to drive hard down the lane, planted my right foot hard as a defender stopped my drive, and when I turned to kick out to the opposite corner my knee went but my foot didn’t. I heard (and felt) a loud pop as my knee hit the ground. When I tried to stand back up, I put pressure on my right foot and I felt my kneecap start to shake violently on its own inside my leg. I was shocked, but didn’t want to cry on the court. The official stopped the game and trainers came running on to the court. My teammate, Sam, carried me off the court along with the trainer who took me to his office. Misty (Delta’s trainer), Kevin (Yorktown’s trainer), and a few student trainers all examined me. Misty said, “Did you hear a pop?” I nodded. “You’re gonna need to go to Central Indiana Orthopedics to get this checked out, but don’t be surprised if he says it’s a torn ACL.” I started bawling at this point. I knew that meant I wouldn’t be able to play anymore, let alone run track. That part sucked the most for me.
“How do you know that?” Mellie furrowed her brow. “Have you been reading my mind?”
Let it all dry overnight.
As full time teacher of technology, IT Director, and IT Integrator, I try to keep this place running and work hard to be efficient. PowerSchool is my baby and I write the SQL reports and do the geek work. I cut all the PO's, write the plans, handle the emails, server set up. Gosh, what else?
it's saturday morning. the column's up. i want to say something witty and har-di har har, but i'm not in the mood. the day's too lovely to think very hard and i'm on my way to the diemersfontein pino on tap fest. well, soon, at least. after some breakfast. and a steam. maybe a wee coffee somewhere...
Oy. Ballplayers, please make a note to yourself: if you (#32 Gregg Jefferies) or a family member (Jackie McReynolds) have to call into the WFAN to defend your honor…maybe you should just put the phone down and step away, and ask for a trade. Seriously, you’re not doing any favors for yourself.
How long is it before the general public assumes we are all lazy bags of hair who collect a paycheck while doing the least amount of work possible because we only got into this profession for the summers off anyway? How long before the general public just accepts that public schools can be equated with failing schools? And how much longer after that before it becomes a self-fulfilling prophesy?
The Grunts by Philip Ardagh and illustrated by Axel Scheffler are going great guns and I liked the look of The Secret Hen House Theatre a debut by London schoolteacher Helen Peters. And of course Dinosaur Zoom! Penny Dale's sequel to my favourite from last year, Dinosaur Dig!
Along the way, you will enrich your entire story because:
Otley Brewery
You’ll know what I’ve done now. I’d apologise, but it’d be futile. I know you’ll think less of me and I’m sorry about that, but I can’t possibly stay. I didn’t fight and survive to sit in sheltered domesticity with a wife and a child. I didn’t even intend to stay in England. I admit I’ve made mistakes, but I can’t allow those mistakes to trap me here for the rest of my life just because you want me to be a better man than I am. My people are fighting for our land, and I need to be part of it.
Now, tWitch is is a phenomenal dancer, and if that’s not enough to make you love him, the fact that he’s incredibly good looking should be enough to push you over the edge. Just in case, here’s one more reason to get behind tWitch: his recent appearance on The Ellen DeGeneres Show. tWitch teamed up with Ellen’s corespondents, Sophia Grace and Rosie. The girls, known for their viral video cover of Nicki Minaj’s ‘Super Bass’, went to tWitch for dance lessons:
Our lives we shed,
Now, why does this governing style sound so familiar?
Much of what I have written above relates to my philosophy of undergraduate teaching. I have enjoyed significant interaction with out graduate students as well, despite the fact that we offer no degree in Latin American History. I have forged this ground for myself because I value graduate education highly. I taught History 510 three time from 2008-2010. As our Foundations class, 510 is a joy to teach in part because of the practical skills of reading, analysis, and communication that form its core. Readings are often theoretical and outside of the scope of experience many of our graduate students bring with them. I have also taught seminars on the Spanish Conquest and on the authority and power in the early modern Spanish Empire. More importantly, outside of the seminar room I have sought opportunities to support and train our graduate students, most notably with the Dissertation Writing Group (DWG) I founded and have directed since 2007. With 510 and the DWG, I have had pleasure of being a sort of bookend for our PhD students progress, from the foundational skills of 510 through their realization in writing the dissertation.
I have no idea what prompted that one, but it made me giggle even today!
Tonight I am so thankful for so much. I have been thinking about how fortunate I am. I have problems and stress like everyone else. I feel sad and cry sometimes, too. I endure loss, physical pain and overwhelming grief just like everyone around me. However, I remember who my Father is and that he is with me always. He has given me everything I need and blessed me with truly beautiful people around me.
6. ***TNA WORLD TAG TEAM CHAMPIONSHIP MATCH: Magnus and Samoa Joe (Champions) vs. Mr. Anderson and Jeff Hardy (Challengers).
Rose Vanden Eynden has always believed in magic, which probably explains how she is able to be a writer as well as a wife, mother, medium, massage therapist, minister, and instructor. She resides in a suburb of Cincinnati, Ohio with her husband, twin teenaged sons, and a dachshund named after Rudyard Kipling. In her spare (!) time, she enjoys performing in live theatre, watching films, reading, and walking in the woods. An avid believer in a balanced life, she meditates and eats chocolate daily.
1 dust
The band also performed at a special benefit show from Tuscaloosa featuring Lee Bains III & The Glory Fires along with, Alabama Shakes and The Dexateens that helped to raise $20,000 in funds for the tornado recovery in that area.
This recipe though, is a fully desirable manifestation of seasonal stubbornness.
I “met” Sarwat Chadda online via the SCBWI-BI writers’ list and subsequently through Facebook and the blogosphere. He was kind enough to send me a proof copy of Devil’s Kiss and I thought I’d share a little about it with you and also an interview with Sarwat.
We did eventually find a nice enough looking hawker centre to stop at. A coffee later, and we were on our way again. No time to dawdle, as we want to be back in Penang tonight, after shopping in KL. Later the landscape became flatter, we started to encounter towns, which were quite congested, and then we approached the motorway into KL, and arrived in our destination a little after 11AM. The trip took about seven hours.
33) De Librije (Zwolle, Netherlands)
Having been in the play, and having read the play multiple times based on Judith Guest’s novel, I made the assumption that the film would be about Conrad Jarrett (Timothy Hutton), since he very much seemed to be the focus of the play. And yes, in many ways, the film is about him, which is why it seemed so strange to me going in that Timothy Hutton won the Oscar for Supporting Actor. After all, he’s on screen a lot of the film—isn’t he the lead?
We all know students learn in different ways, but how do we teach the same concepts to multiple learners with different abilities? The core of differentiated instruction comes from understanding and nurturing differences among learners, how they learn, learning preferences and individual interests. Classroom technology is providing teachers various avenues to reach multiple learners with different abilities at the same time. From a case study from a teacher in Kansas, find out how hardware, software and the web are enabling educators to personalize instruction while enhancing learning.
Undoubtedly one way or other we all are effected by corruption, but what we are forgetting here that apart from corruption, there are some other issues equally important and do need our attention...but somehow these issues are getting escaped or untouched from our drawing room discussions. They do not touch us in a real sense bcoz we urban class people never experience these issues.....
-turkey mince (500g)
The publisher, ‘Hidden Thoughts Press’ will be donating some proceeds of the book to the Family Service league’s adult home project.
During sleep, our brain releases inhibiting substances to prevent us from acting out our dreams fully, although we may toss, turn and even talk in our sleep. The feline brain works similarly. In laboratory experiments where unfortunate feline subjects have had their brains tampered with so that those substances aren’t released, the cats act out their dreams in full. Even laboratory-bred cats which have never hunted, or even seen prey, have been observed to ‘catch birds’, ‘chase mice’ and ‘bat prey’ in the course of their dreams.
“Our Approach
The Coffin-Maker’s Daughter; Angela Slatter (A Book of Horrors, Jo Fletcher Books)
while i was trying to not cry too many ..
That’s what I’m talking about. I mentioned before the season started how I’d like for our defensive players to approach their opponents. And I’m glad to read that this is the exact approach dictated to our players by our coaches.
Today was spent making all kinds of delicious chocolate confections. We turned my Mom's house into Willy Wonka's Chocolate Factory. With Christmas music playing on the radio and all the Christmas lights turned on, we melted pounds and pounds of chocolate, and made all kinds of chocolate confections to give to friends as Christmas gifts.
Matt wanted a minimalist design, dominated by black and using white for text (and then we chose light blue as an accent colour).
Do beards still exist in the modern world? Some people have jumped to the conclusion that George Clooney’s latest girlfriend is a beard, merely because she used to be a professional wrestler. That doesn’t follow at all. Being attracted to a female who can put you in a headlock has nothing to do with being gay, as any male gorilla will tell you.
"Lager
The sequence of how everything happened “behind-the-scenes” is difficult to say, but the stage-prop increase in the project size occurred at roughly the same time that Forest City Ratner was dealing with Ms. Burden and her Department of City Planning. Though substantial contemporaneousness is clear, the exact sequence is difficult to lay out because while indicative dates are public, not all of the dates that would determine a full sequence are out. The swelling in scope of the project’s size occurred around the date of September 5, 2005, the date when a draft project scope came out that added 2800 condominium units. The Observer article appearing not long after that indicates that, as of the time it was published, Ms. Burden and the Department of City Planning had been dealing with the project for a while. The Department of City Planning informed Noticing New York that the Department started looking at the project “in 2004.” The date of the Observer article is November 22, 2005 and it is the Observer article that mentions both that “Burden says she is happy with the project as a whole” and that she was saying she didn’t have “veto power” over the project. Although the article it mentions the superblocking concern associated with Pacific Street being eliminated, there is no mention of a City Planning concern about the project’s size. The City Planning Commission’s official assessment of Atlantic Yards is in a September 27, 2006 letter that was released with the announcement of “the reduction.” (The Planning Commission is distinct from the Planning Department though they function together and both are headed by Ms. Burden.)
Milk - 1 cup
Here, well, daddy is home (hurrah!) and it's pretty cloudy and rainy where we are, so we're just having a lazy day hanging around the house. Daddy is playing Barbie with Zoe, Ben is asleep and Josh is at his grandma's, so mummy is having a little 'me' time for now. Feeling a touch tired as Ben has decided to wake for an extra feed overnight for the last two nights.....*yawn*.
If you have elementary school-aged children, you have been presented with the following scenario:
My standard response to this response about police mental health awareness training – EVERY SINGLE TIME – is that such claims may well be true, but mental health and social care professionals needs more “police awareness training” around procedures and law. Most AMHPs I’ve met, can’t explain s135(1) properly, for example – although many can. Most mental health nurses on wards who are asking for patients to be arrested following assaultative behaviour, don’t realise that we arrest people to commence and investigative and criminal justice process, not for the convenience of NHS staff. If there is no complaint of an offence or no evidence of liability, arrests don’t occur however desirable someone may think that would be. (You should see the list of people I’d arrest in a fantasy world where we do it because I think it would be a good idea.)
“We believe that robust industry self-regulation coupled with consumer education is the most effective way to protect consumer privacy while fostering innovation,” wrote the Digital Advertising Alliance, which represents advertising networks and associations.
Have you ever asked yourself why, despite more than ten years of efforts –involving, among other things, the loss of thousands of lives in wars in Iraq and Afghanistan, well-over a trillion dollars spent, countless man-years wasted waiting in airport security lines and endless efforts to ensure that no offense is given to seemingly permanently aggrieved Muslim activists – are we no closer to victory in the so-called “war on terror” than we were on 9/11?
No, no need to worry. The short story is merely hiding out in the novel until it is safe to come out. And soon it will be safe to come out. Because the internet is creating a vast new habitat that has not yet found its final shape, or final inhabitants. Cyberspace is ripe to be colonized by the small and nimble vole of the short story, who will change his form to suit the new terrain. But it will still be short, and still a story. It’s going to be alright.
Brisket is lean, but not dry and well smoked. Would be excellent if not smothered in sauce, but it's very good even with it.
But, they tended to write regular, with a lot to say.
I just put Braska down, she’s sleeping well so far, breathing much better tonight, and I’m dashing for the bed while I have the chance. Who knows what the next few hours might bring. I’m praying we snooze all night long.
In celebration of the FOUR years that ODBD has been giving glory to God, and growing as a significant player in the stamping world, we decided to try to pick our FOUR ALL TIME FAVORITE ODBD sets, and to use at least one on our project today. Yikes!!! How can I possibly just choose 4? Well.... if I have to, I have listed here what I believe are :
Olde Saratoga Brewing Co/Mendocino
dad was evil. She would tell us that there was a black hole in his
You can make a spear either by sharpening a strong stick with your pocket knife and then hardening it in the fire, or by lashing your knife onto the end of a stick using vines. The latter is more efficient, but you risk losing your knife in the water if you aren't careful. In a real life-or-death survival situation, your pocket knife is your life line, so you don't want to take any chances with it. Since ours wasn't really a life-or-death situation, the boys chose whichever method they were comfortable with, and we had a mixture of both among the group.
Having wondered if I might die on the way, I was surprised to arrive at the musee de la batellerie (which is something to do with boats). It was closed, being lunchtime, obviously, but there was a giant boat sticking out of the wall to let you know where you were.
at the corner of the house
"Kelly, Kelly, where's Stella? What happened to her? We're did she go? Who was that?"
Remember the coke can I mentioned earlier? Coke cans have a shiny, concave bottom. Not quite shiny enough for what we need, but it's a start. If you take some fine-grained sand from the bottom of the creek and use it as an abrasive, you can polish the bottom of the can to a mirror finish in no time at all. Now, what's a shiny, concave surface good for? Well besides a mirror, it works very well as a magnifying glass. All you have to do is aim it toward the sun, find the focal point of the reflector, and hold something flammable there. In about 5 seconds, you get fire. Though it was pure luck that we found the coke can out there, I had a backup plan too, just in case (always have a plan B - that's the first rule of survival). My canteen has a similar concave bottom and would have worked just as well for that purpose. Or if you wear glasses, you can use them too. But it was instructive for the boys to see it done with an empty coke can, plus we removed a piece of litter and cleaned up the forest a little bit in the process.
Ten meters from the water’s edge...
Bachmann: yes but noted ghoul Dick Cheney
Thanks for stopping by today,
The are several answers to this question. Firstly, Sarkozy does not want to be tainted with anymore of the DCN dirt. The French conglomerate has been involved in just too many dark deals. Mysterious deaths have occurred because the size of the bribes offered have been so huge, those who received the largesse would do ‘anything’ to hang onto their new-found but unsavory wealth.
Jurors:
When I say “itself,” I mean about the angelic kingdom, not about the human realm. I’m saying what does the angelic kingdom want us to know about itself?
Tonight during dinner, we heard a high pitched whistling sound coming from the formal dining room. It was at this point my mind flashed to the gopher in Caddy Shack. Were the squirrels out to get us? Upon further investigation, we discovered a squirrel running around the skylight area and back and forth across the rafters. We tried to encourage it to leave, but the high whistling sound continued. It was obvious the little guy was in distress for some reason. We assumed it couldn’t figure out how to leave, until The International Man of Intrigue went to the other side of the dining room for a better look and discovered another squirrel hovered in the doorway. It had either fallen or climbed down and couldn’t get back up. The International Man of Intrigue walked softly closer, speaking in a calm voice, assuring the little squirrel he was only going to open the door so it could go back outside. Too bad she wasn’t buying it. She darted across the dining room as he opened the door. Luckily, she seemed young and confused and didn’t hide, so she was quickly herded back outside.
I might not be a super model, I might not be your age anymore, I might not be rich… But what I earned I did get with hard work, I’m honest and the man on my side loves me for how and who I am.
Further down the list was the EEO form, which wants to know my gender (male or female) and ethnicity. I left that blank as well, although given the choice, I would identify with the female gender. If I had freedom to dress as I choose, I would not go 24/7 but I'd either be part male/part female or all female. Even now, some days I'm in all female clothing, although appearing male.
When most people think of the economic decline that is happening in America, most of them think of states like California and cities like Detroit. In both cases, unemployment is rampant, government finances are a mess, and businesses and families are both leaving in droves. So what is causing this? What do California and Detroit have in common? Well, for one thing, both the state of California and the city of Detroit have been run by anti-business socialist control freaks for decades. Once upon a time millions of young Americans that dreamed of a better life flocked to California and Detroit was one of the most vibrant manufacturing cities in the history of the world. But now both of them are in an advanced state of decline, and a lot of the blame can be placed at the feet of the politicians in both cases. Both California and Detroit have become very unfriendly places to businesses and families, so businesses and families have been leaving both California and Detroit in very large numbers. At the same time, the socialist welfare policies in both places have caused them to become magnets for those that enjoy being dependent on the government. Welfare recipients are not likely to pack up and move down to Texas because they know that their benefits would not be nearly as good down there. So both California and Detroit will continue to attract those that want to live under socialist control freaks and it will continue to drive away those that do not want to live under socialist control freaks.
I told her a little about camp, but she didn’t seem interested. My mom met us, and struck up a conversation, and after that I didn’t talk any more. That afternoon, as I tried on various pants and shirts, I felt truly free. I could walk away from her and not care.
4) Students write a paragraph about their mother. Their opening sentence can be "Are you my mother?" I also have them use this for their final sentence. I am sorry I don't have a closeup of the actual writing. Here is a sample: Are you my mother? My mother has blonde hair and brown eyes. She loves to wash dishes and does them every night. My mother is a great reader. I love it when she reads to me. We go to the library once every week. My mother is a wonderful cook. I love her spaghetti! I love my mother and she loves me! Are you my mother?
TACKY GUM RUBBER VIBRAM ® OUTSOLE
So I happened onto the bud vases and thought one would make a nice gift for my co-worker, who doesn't suffer from allergies like me and plans for gardens and flowers and vegetables thrill her to no end.
All for now, hope you all have a great weekend, Penny-Rose xx
It’s been said by some that a working class Scot has more in common with the working classes in other nations than with other Scots who aren’t ‘working class’ and that there’s a ‘Social Union’ of shared values and mutual cultural interests which binds all on these islands together and which will survive Scots independence. There is little, if anything, to support either of these affectations, they appear as confections created to bolster political positions. I have cousins who are English, born on the Albion side of the border and have lived there ever since, proud of where they come from and proud, too, of their nation. They’re my family and always will be – even during World Cups – but I have more in common with those who have chosen Scotland for their home.
Till I find my way back to this blog, all my best to you…
I've also become obsessed with the idea of coupons. Notice how I said the idea of coupons. Although I know I will never be able to shop like the people on TLC's Extreme Couponing, I know that I can cut back tremendously. Any other couponers out there? Any great sites or tips?
for themselves and for profit.
Don Rober began the bath by dipping the water out and pouring it right over me, covering me head to toe with several waterfalls. This may be the hot jungle, but that river water is very cold – so cold and unexpected that I could not help but squeal loudly as I took huge breaths, my heart racing. Don Rober laughed and began his ministrations with smoking a mapacho of rustic tobacco and blowing the smoke into the crown of my head. He began to whistle his icaro and pat me with the shacapa.
But my real reason for heading to India was as a gift to myself.
On a bright note, the change of the calendar does mean there are only eight more months until Baltimore Beer Week 2010.
The Chief is busting his butt to get ahead of the drug induced crime wave sweeping Hyannis. He's got a new task force of his own out on the street right now. They reportedly made seven arrests their first two days on the job. The Chief has already visited with the local judges so that they understand that the arrests made by this new unit are the bad guys that need to be off the street. I'll tell you more about it next week after the formal announcement. I don't want to steal the Chief's thunder. This is his deal and he deserves all the credit for pulling this team together.
Are you happy?
Everyone is welcome to play along!
head on over to the new site and check it out! there are a lot of great new features! the new home will also involve a few changes. while i’ll still be posting photos of the day as well as my other daily features, i really hope to introduce more crafty tutorials, before & after projects, and free downloads for all to enjoy.
There is no easy solution for changing the fortunes of the Welsh economy. Wales does not have sufficient resources to work alone in attracting inward investment to Wales nor the advantages that UKTI has in terms of resources and networks. We were disappointed that the Business Minister for Wales chose not to give evidence to this inquiry. The Minister's decision was a grave discourtesy to the Committee and to Parliament. The Welsh Government must engage with politicians in the UK Government to maximise opportunities to attract inward investment to Wales and so improve the long-term prospects of the Welsh economy. The UK Government and the Welsh Government must work together effectively, and work with education providers and industry, for the improvement of the Welsh economy and the Welsh people.'
He did good today.
colors bleed into darkness, a descent into the void.
“We need new songs to hit the airwaves, new expressions for this generation” explains Ryan Cayabyab, Executive Director of PhilPOP. One of the Philippines most celebrated musicians, Ryan Cayabyab inspires a new generation of song writers and composers as well as spearheads the return of OPM through a familiar platform he himself has gone through.
Peter Crowther – ‘The Longest Distance Between Two Places’ by Will Halloway
The doctor just came in and told us that she does need to have surgery to correct this, and it needs to happen before next week, or we could be looking at a very severe situation. Problem is, there's nobody at this hospital that can do it laparoscopically, so they'll have to transfer her down to a hospital in downtown Kansas City tomorrow. I'm thinking I'll probably delay my flight home and come back to Austin afterwards, if I can.
Where is your focus? Is your focus on all the bad things or on what God is doing? Are you just looking at the bad things or are you looking for the God opportunities? I love this verse and cling to it a lot because it keeps me focused on where my mind should be - Philippians 4:8 – Finally, brethren, whatever is true, whatever is honorable, whatever is right, whatever is pure, whatever is lovely, whatever is of good repute, if there is any excellence and if anything worthy of praise, dwell on these things. So where is your focus, on the negative things that happening in life or are you focusing on what God is doing around you and are you looking for and thinking about those positive things?
He helped me up and held me and again we were just quiet together. I cried silent tears into his neck. I yawned and then couldn't stop yawning. He patted me twice and I got up. He brought me to bed undressed me and told me to lay down. I laid on my belly and he didn't cover me. He kissed me pointed the fan on me and went to get ready for bed. When he came back I was already dozing. He laid down and pulled me to him. He whispered to me for a bit. My eyes were so heavy with sleep that I could only mumble a sound here and there when I thought it appropriate. He kissed my eyes. He told me everything was right again. He told me he was going to sleep well because I was back in his arms. He dragged his fingers softly up and down my back. I sighed. He pressed his lips against my forehead and prepared for sleep. I could feel the warm breath coming from his nostrils. Then ever so softly he whispered the most beautiful words against my skin.
Add broccoli rabe to the pasta water and cook for one minute. Strain and roughly chop.
Basically, the plot is about a lonely housewife with a desultory sex life. The new hubbie is lovely, but boring. And his bed skills are less than satisfactory. That's the thing when you marry Boy-Next-Door types. You sacrifice the erotic for the safe; the dangerous risk-taker for the trustworthy do-gooder. Anyhow, The Housewife grows bored with vanilla sex and sets out to find something pulsier. That's when she meets The Spanish Guy Who's Still A Virgin. (There's an oxymoron right there). From then on, she proceeds to educate him in – you guessed it – the art of pleasure. To use a ladylike word. There are hotel rooms, orgies, taxi drivers and what one critic described as "erotic, Houellebecqean-style encounters". (I'm not sure what that means but I think I'll have some if they're on special, thanks.)
All of these struggles that I have mentioned only become more complicated for a guy when you introduce a girl into the picture.
For your own chance to win some fun fun stuff, head over to Today's Mama to find out how to enter. Fun times! I hope to be back soon with a "real" blog post. Until then, best wishes for the happiest of Thanksgivings!
Cheers for reading.
presenting the "official" 2011 santa portrait -- ha!
where gravity weighs the most.
For then you’d see the “fancy sheets”,
Following up on first novel Olivia is now in the picture and staring beside Harry Valentine in What Happens in London by Julia Quinn.
A final personal note: I naturally put a yew tree in my walled garden in Park Slope. It’s the only tree I have planted in New York. It grows very slowly but it is indifferent to drought, cold, or the large angry trees around it. It will probably be the only plant I have planted to survive if I abandon my garden.
First come first serve. Shipping is not included. You can choose your shipping method. Paypal and credit cards accepted. You are welcome to send a check but your items will not be shipped until the check clears the bank. You will be responsible for any return check fees.
and your sons, they are known to me,
After all, it is a child’s wellbeing and future prospects which are at stake.
Sarah Pinborough – Diary Entry #3
I’m not a Catholic, as I previously said, but I am a romantic. The papal visit fills me with a sense of occasion, a sense of history. I fail to see how one could not be moved by the whole thing, unless one had a soul of clay. For the first time in our history, in the history of Christianity itself, the head of the Catholic Church came to our island on an official visit. More than that, he gave a speech in Westminster Hall, in the very place where Thomas More stood trial for his life, holding to a simple principle that there was a higher duty than duty to the state. More, as a Catholic, believed in miracles. Even so he could never have conceived that the miracle of time and of circumstance would bring the successor of Saint Peter to a place where he once stood alone.
Since it is T-Ball the kids only advance one base on a hit. Each kid bats and then they all run around the bases after the last child bats. So what it comes down to basically is which team gets the most outs. An inning can end once there are three outs, but that seldom ever happens. The team we played recorded no outs against us as all of our kids reached base safely. We were able to record two outs against the other team so we consider that a victory! We don't talk about winning and losing to the kids as it is just about having fun for them, but as parents of course we want our team to win and we did! We don't plan on losing either.
Of course, sooner or later, carpet bombing New York City with my resume is going to mean I'll get a job. But when I do, who will take out the trash and sweep the kitchen floor? Who will make the phone calls? Who will go to the post office, stop by the pharmacy, braise the chicken?
As opposed to units 1-3 at Fukushima Daiichi, where the meltdowns occurred, unit 4′s reactor core, like units 5 and 6, was not in operation when the earthquake struck last year. But unlike units 5 and 6, it had recently uploaded highly radioactive spent fuel into its storage pool before the disaster struck.
As I sit at my computer, typing this out, I take a moment to pause, and say aloud the words that I feel are necessary, to start this project. “Hello, blog-world. My name is Michael Leach. (I breathe a deep sigh, preparing myself to say the words that are about to come.) And, I am a shopaholic. (Whew! That wasn’t so bad.)” My desire to shop borders on the edge of being ridiculous. Every time I get a few extra bucks in my pocket, I feel the need to go and purchase something….ANYTHING! The desire to spend money is overwhelming.
for our fellow man, yet, from day to
Punctuate direction tips are also several what suchlike that!
I decided on a Spring collage using one of the MDF plaques available from Joanna Sheen. It was painted with matt emulsion. The grunge paper flowers, die cut letters and the MDF bird house were given the weathered wood treatment using fresco finish paints & crackle medium.
"Nobody likes me. Everybody hates me. Guess I'll go eat worms..."
2. Heat oil in a non-stick pan. Add mustard seeds and when they splutter add Cumin seeds and asafoetida. Immediately add curry leaves and green chili, chopped onion and saute till onion turns transparent.
We know that piece number three in this puzzle must happen by a fixed date in the near future.
shred chicken & serve over rice
21) MISSING – The Invictas
"I HAVE TO BE UP AT 3 AM. I NEED SLEEP, YOU ALWAYS EXAGGERATE EVERYTHING AND IM NOT GOING TO SIT AT THE HOSPITAL ALL NIGHT JUST FOR THEM TO GIVE YOU SOME TYLENOL AND SEND YOU HOME, SUCK IT UP AND GO TOMORROW BY YOURSELF"
You pull out of the station and take an immediate right to begin ascending the first hill. The clickety-clack of Judge is especially beautiful. To the right is an artificial lake and the rest of the park which you can contemplate as you ride to the top, then it's up and over. Two hills and five camelbacks later, you're done. Elegant and absolutely wonderful.
NBC Sports network has two games scheduled Sunday night, if necessary.
Consider this a match against two boxers, but for design geeks.
May I, may we, the Church, learn to discern. And may our voice be heard echoing through the realms of darkness…
"First, I should say that the point I'm making there is in many ways a critical one, meaning that it's directed at other historians of metal who have tried to pinpoint the origins of the genre. I've never been convinced that metal originated with a set of isolated gestures (such as the two I name, the Kinks 'You Really Got Me' or the sound of Blue Cheer). That's not to say I don't think those earlier things contributed to the formation of metal, but in my understanding, a genre doesn't exist until there's enough of a critical mass of things that all seem related to each other that people start to perceive something to be there that wasn't there before. That critical mass didn't exist in 1965 or 1967 or even arguably in 1969, but to my mind it does start to come more to fruition right at the turn of the 1970s. The fact that the term 'heavy metal' doesn't appear in print in anything like its recognized form until 1970/71 only further proves the point for me. While I don't think one can ever definitively draw a line in the sand and say, this is the date after which metal clearly exists as a genre, I'm of the conviction that most of what precedes 1970 belongs to the prehistory of metal, not to the history of metal proper (but I'd be willing to make some exceptions for things like Led Zeppelin's first couple albums, both released in '69).
The Fair Ones in fair Amanitas’ rings have gathered
And held her in his hand.
Now if you go to vladtepes you will come across articles where a 17 year old girl was sexually assaulted by a 26 year old father of 3 taxi driver – Zameer Arshad.
What do you think? Is this confession, simple as it is, enough to prove that someone is a Christian? Does it say enough to be a good confession of Median Christianity while avoiding the pitfall of Mediocre Christianity?
Ford CEO Alan Mulally, speaking to reporters in Los Angeles on Tuesday, said the company does not yet know if the resin shortage will cut into its global production.
One day he was dead.
Thanks so much for reading! I’ve loved every moment of the journey so far. If you love to write, my advice is ‘go for it’! You may never become rich, but I guarantee it’ll add an extra dimension to your life and put the sparkle back in your eyes. So here’s to the next 100 posts & to many more adventures!
The jug is the ancestral milk jug which graced the breakfast tables of my childhood and was filled with fresh milk brought in a can from the dairy down the road. Milk bottles on the table were 'common' and came later anyway. But that is another story.
(Ready to Cook)
- she makes the best faces. hands down. I never knew our sweet, calm baby would grow up and be so funny. my aunt calls her our little ham and the nickname fits her personality.
No. We have distorted this profound mystery. We have chosen pollutants over purity on more than one occasion. And nights have watched silent tears and God has grieved. Arrogance and folly and horrible decisions have stolen the sweetness of our sexuality and we are left with bruised fruit. And we do not look the part of God’s handiwork. Somehow, someone has scrawled across His masterpiece.
A man his fists, a woman her charms.
The agency has never before publicly questioned the process behind one of its approvals, never admitted that a regulatory decision was influenced by politics, and never accused a former commissioner of questionable conduct.
Thereafter, after an equilibrium of about two years the process revers ed but not that heavily. Bengalis had, therefore, every reason to be chary of and chagrin with the sala Punzabis. (every West Pakistani was a Punjabi to them).
Suntory 7.6%
Salaam Bombay! (L. Subramaniam)
So, will there be retouching? A little. Estee Lauder spokesperson Tara Weisenberg described it as "minor." Damn.
It’s been 40 years to the day — since April 17, 1972, or 14,600 days ago — that Herman Wallace and Albert Woodfox have been held in solitary confinement in Louisiana. The state says they were guilty of murdering a guard at Angola Prison, but Wallace, Woodfox and their network of supporters say they were framed for their political activism as members of the Black Panthers. Woodfox and Wallace founded the Angola chapter of the Black Panther Party in 1971. A third prisoner, Robert King joined them a year later. The three campaigned for better working conditions and racial solidarity between inmates, as well as an end to rape and sexual slavery. Today, to mark the 40-year anniversary of their placement in solitary confinement, Amnesty USA says it will deliver a petition to Louisiana Gov. Bobby Jindal that bears the signatures of tens of thousands of people from 125 countries. We speak to Robert King who was released in 2001 when his conviction was overturned and he pleaded guilty to a lesser offense. “We want the state of Louisiana, and we want the world to know, that we are still focusing on this case that is a total violation of human rights and civil rights,” King says. “It is ongoing.”
July 24
She then laid her hands on the girl's head and blessed her, saying, "Keep God in your heart, and it will go well with you." With that she closed her eyes. When she was laid to rest in the earth, the girl walked behind the coffin crying, and paid her last respects.
“The notes of the fragrance are comprised of Bergamot Blossom, Pink Lady Apple and Red Currant, with a heart of rich, sexy floral notes and end with a warm vanilla, amber and musk,” HSN said.
What do you think? Vote below:
Those who are deeply mortgaged into real estate, won’t be soon… either one way or the other. Which do you choose: whether you will be dry or wet when the thunderstorm breaks, when even the people who only worship words will be faced with the God of all words? We can wait until then to know God speechlessly, or just go ahead right now. Be grateful for every single aspect of your life… for so long as you shall live… starting as soon as you choose to stop doing anything else.
Perhaps some reviewers are not so concerned with an authors' feelings but worry rather that a bad review will stop a book selling. This concern is founded on the assumption that anyone reading a bad review will be put off even looking at a book. But it's a breathtaking patronization of readers to assume that they'll swallow wholesale a blogger's views. As some commenters have said, they are often prompted by a bad review to read a book and are not only pleasantly surprised but provoked to write a contradictory, positive review. Susan Hill however has stated that she has noted 'lemming' behaviour among bloggers - I hope she's not right. Someone somewhere during this week's discussion (can't find it at the moment, I'm sorry) quoted an American study which showed that while negative reviews do not push up the sales of books as much as positive reviews, they do nevertheless push them up.
The forum we mentioned is http://www.abolitionistapproach.com/forum/ where you can find Niilo's "abolitionist mom" Joe and other great advocates, discussing abolitionist veganism and all kinds of other things.
The solution is in realizing that we are not purely physical, athiest, beings without connections to the Source of All Life, whatever name you use. For those of you who are scientific minded, there still was the big bang, first energy, the first generation, the first initiator of this multi-universe galaxy, and other galaxies; or however you comprehend the pictures we get back from the Hubbell telescope.
To redeem this discount you must show your public library card at any Paper Plus store nationwide to instantly receive 30% off any title from The Hunger Games trilogy. The offer is valid until Wednesday 9th May.
It was Bloomsday today!
I am realizing more and more the need to take time alone in reflection and prayer. It is in these times that I feel re-energized, re-invigorated, and fully rested. And, not surprisingly, I find myself more in tune with God, more attentive to His will, and more open to the guidance of His Spirit.
These beers, of course, are from Belgium, and represent some incredible breweries and styles. We are going to be pairing these with cheeses made at Sweet Grass Dairy in south Georgia. Not only are the cheeses going to be featured, but the head "cheese" from the dairy is also going to be at this event. He will be there to help educate you guys about cheese making, Georgia cheeses, cows I suppose, and whatever you want to know. These folks are personal friends of our chef, Peter, so it will be a great opportunity for you to mingle with them if you are curious at all about what they do. Peter is going to feature the cheeses creatively in small bites, not just a piece of cheese on a plate. This is not, I repeat, not a beer dinner. This event is going to run from 3:00-5:00pm and consist of those six beers in 4 oz. pours and the six little bites to feature the cheese and compliment each beer. The cost is $30.00 (cheap!), and there will be guys from the importer of these beers on hand to talk about beer (if you are into that kind of thing, and you are). The structure will be loose, with each pairing at stations located throughout The Fred so that you can move around and taste at your own pace. Will have cool beer stuff to give away? Probably. We usually do. No promises though.
1.Rastros de Sangue
74. I Have to Go: Robert Munsch
The story of my mother is a book all on it’s own. One I could not write because it’s one I couldn’t ever reread…relive. Not just for me. For my sisters. For my nieces. For my nephews. For my son. I cannot relive it all. Because poison kills. I made it threw once…just barely. I wouldn’t take my chances with a second go-around.
Can you think of any more rude questions you get when you're pregnant? Can you think of any better answers? Answering a prying question without seeming rude or offending the asker is a tough job!
Sometimes Arty wondered about the path the world was rolling down. He, and many agents in Population Management believed that eventually their country would be set to rights through their efforts. One day the Death department would be eliminated and even Birth could be downsized, leaving the Life agents to guide the people who were born into the managed world. It had been decades, though, and while a large percentage of the population had accepted the way an had no reason to criticize it, there were those who still committed crimes ranging between minor and atrocious and clung to their right to protest. Their numbers had gone down, but not quickly enough for Arty. He sometimes wished they could be even harsher, get more crimes in the category of assassination so they didn’t have to waste a year on people who were not going to adapt. Trim it down to the contributors, to the parents who wanted to raise kids to be better than those that came before, to the people who could see the reasons behind the system.
Don’t misunderstand me. I’m thankful for all I learned in that suburban cattle stall, which was a lot. Seriously, it was. And I also developed skills I’ll use throughout my life. But in the past month-and-a-half I’ve learned just how depressed I’d become, and how my aquifers of creativity were all but dry. This is a tough situation for me to face, but I trust in my God and my soon-to-be wife to help me recover.
He's a liar/deceiver and accuser
-- I have seven students in Basic Comp. Six of them failed it last semester. I feel really sorry for the other one, who seems like a nice, responsible kid, and I'm already starting to regret my decision to move toward more peer workshopping in that class. OTOH, I'm glad that we're starting over with fresh assignments.
Mamma, I told you don’t shout!
Invert the ruffle to look like a tissue paper liner standing up and place your flowers above that.
Cavallini carries some of the most gorgeous paper goods, some of my favorite being their line of gift wrapping papers, available from Paper Source here, at $3.95 for a 20" x 28" sheet. Although I think it's a bit steep for that size wrapping paper, I adore them for wall art because they're high quality construction and awesomely-priced as artwork. This one is currently displayed in our kitchen (pictures to come!):
Raskin joined Apple in 1978 -- as its 31st employee -- to start the young company's publications department. At the time, computers were primarily text-based and users had to remember a series of arcane commands to perform the simplest tasks.
TCI: So you don’t, per say, support Record Store Day?
Enough of that! Have a great day! Hug someone and ask them to pass it on! Maybe a hug is another way to ‘pay it forward’!
Anyway, you will have until 11:59pm EST on Sunday, August 7 to play along. Please NEW creations only and although STAMP-N-DOODLE images are not required to play along, we'd sure LOVE to see them if you have them. You can find the FULL COLLECTION by clicking the STAMP-N-DOODLE STORE link above.
I also hear this woman say, “I miss you like you can’t imagine,” to the man on the other end of the line. I can even see her smile as she whispers words of comfort and security. I smile when I hear her laughter, the soft laughter which I am sure makes that person far away smile dreamily as well. That person far away whom I cannot hear no matter how much of myself I immerse in this little corner in my head. I cannot hear what he says to make her eyes light up like they do at such moments, but I know it must be much more than I can imagine when she tells him, “I don’t have to dream of you; you are my dream.” I wish I can hear those words when I am outside of my head.
I just spent a week at my parents’ place in Wisconsin, and there is nothing like the country to lend perspective on all human endeavors. My city slicker problems melted away as we discussed more relevant matters: Which recycled materials in the basement were going to become a proper chicken coup? How were my brothers and partner going to extract a giant boulder from the middle of the garden? What shape would this year’s deer fence take? What was for dinner?
Preheat oven to 400. Spray a 13X9 baking dish with cooking spray.
We lived on the corner of Trigg and 32nd street. The same house, the same friends, the same neighborhood colored every one of my school years. As I got older what I considered entertainment and my motivations changed but looking back I have nothing but fond memories. Yeah I'm lucky to have escaped serious damage to myself or other given some of the crap we did but most of our activities were harmless.
What made you want to start writing?
Speaking of Apple, who drinks very similar cool-aide to Qualcomm you have a similar cash and marketable position, about $26 billion. But the two market caps are wildly different. Much has been made of Apples king of the world market cap. Qualcomm comes in at a very pedestrian $100 Billion give or take. An extra $520 million effort less risk free at Apple will not be kicked out of bed. But it just will not have the same impact relatively speaking.
I didn't know, but I figured it was something disgusting or precious. Those are the only real things she puts in her mouth...disgusting things or things that are precious to you (e.g. Ollie's blanket).
Absolutely.
Nathan's Grandma happens to be a fellow teacher (actually my master teacher when I student taught) and a good friend of mine, so we really enjoyed spending time with them! Lines were short, weather was great, Disneyland was decked out for Christmas...a perfect day!
I managed to stay up for all of three hours before going back to bed for a 4 hour nap.
I Heart You
Nearing
In the prayer we also recognize that our human failings against Love are a major impediment to the fulfillment of His Will and therefore ask for His forgiveness, in accord with our forgiveness of those who trespass against us. In doing this we clear out anything in us that would impede His Will from being accomplished.
The rally is a direct challenge to Najib, who since last year’s crackdown, has launched a campaign to repeal authoritarian laws in a bid to create what he called “the greatest democracy”.
I used the Prayer of St. Francis, which we all are familiar with if for no other reason than having heard the song that was made using the words of this prayer. I have been singing that song ever since I created this card! LOL! Anyway... my card base is Bazzill and is cut with Spellbinders Labels 23 Grand. The prayer is stamped on My Mind's Eye Bella Bella dp. I used Cheery Lynn Exotic Butterflies Small, Versafine Sepia Ink, Martha Stewart bough punch,ZVA Creative small white roses, and the larger pink rose if from the bridal dept. at Micheal's. This was super quick and easy but with the cut shape, it packs quite a punch!
Anheuser-Busch, Inc. Michelob Amber Bock
McIntyre and Heath were a blackface team who started out in the golden age of minstrelsy and were still going well into the jazz age. McIntyre played “Alexander” the slow-witted stable boy; Heath played “Hennery”, his pompous friend who tried to put on airs. Their most famous sketch (of many) was called “the Ham Tree” – they rung various changes on it for 50 years. A 1905 full-length version provided W.C. Fields with his first speaking part. Other sketches included “the Georgia Minstrels”, “the Man from Montana”, “Flying to Jail”, “Chickens”, and “Waiting at the Church”.
(Also, I've discovered Supernatural, but that's a blog post in itself.)
A bike ride, an empty street, a lovely view ahead. This is what you wanted in life. You are a character in your own own movie and you control every move.
‘No, I don’t think it is either.’
* The movie collaborators wanted to give something back to the Trees and they did it the best way they know how by sharing from their hearts. This movie is dedicated to The Guardians of planet earth.
1) Given the Professor’s exit, I have given up fantasizing about him, even though he is the best lay I have had, he has the biggest dick I have seen, and the very thought of him inside me again makes my knees weak. (Ok… writing this blog has made me re-fantacise). But after the “official broken heart” that I could see coming a mile away, even though I didn’t want to really acknowledge my own intelligence on the matter, fantasies about him have essentially disappeared. Essentially, within one day, my own material withered down to nil.
Then if you have to terminate the employee, it won’t be a shock. And just as important, with a well-organized process, the problem won’t drag on too long and you will have documented the reasons behind your decision.
Either scenario is terrifying. Both scenario’s are almost identical and can be applied to each other. One side believes it is God’s punishment for sin, the other believes it is our punishment for being sheep. Both believe that we can survive and in some cases prevent this from happening. Although I have observed many who plan to let it happen. Who revel in the events eventuality. It would certainly disturb some of you to know, some willingly wish to help these mythical rulers execute this plan. They feel that somehow these monsters will see fit to care for them and lift them from the destruction for their obedience.
Rite Aid
R.Y.
earlier this week, i painted an antique refrigerator...brooke rescued this refrigerator before it was headed to the goodwill pile (from her in-laws, so it was a family piece), and she had a vision! we used inspiration from the restoration hardware catalog, and i really kind of just played with washes and finishes until we came to a place that felt right for the piece. i wish you guys could see the rest of the room that this piece is now in...it's really beautiful! brooke has great taste, and i can't wait to show you the piece once she has it all decorated. :)
When mercury goes out of retrograde, communication lines open again. Seriously in this case, I got that phone today. I predict this means good things for you this week.
dark salad greens: mesclun mix, spinach, or arugula are good choices
11. Mudcrutch "Queen of the Go-Go Girls" 3:43
So... wood won.
Finally, I turn to my wife. "Do you think that still counts as a request?"
It was a wet Monday morning and Mr P and Mrs Rine had gone their separate ways to work with the common expression of somebody who has lost Johnny Walker and found Chris Evans.
It’s also handy to remember that not all servers will support all php functions.You can run a little bit of php and you will get a handy display in your browser that will give you the run-down on what is supported.
“I was struggling with the fact that so many black people have lost their farmland, and here I was faced with having to help a white person save their land. So I didn’t give him the full force of what I could do. I did enough.”
Flowers, brad and sentiment - stash
There are two types of memberships offered by the N.I.P.P.A. The first is an annual membership, which is offered free with any purchase from Bushido Productions. The second is alifetime membership, which is offered free with the purchase of Master Moran’s set of twelve pressure point clinic tapes.
Lisa xx
“We German National Socialists have recognized that not international solidarity frees the peoples from the ties of international capital, but the organized national force. …The National Socialist German Workers’ Party asks you all to come … to a GIANT DEMONSTRATION against the continued cheating of our people by the Jewish agents of the international world stock-exchange capital.”
And now to tell you about my latest project.
I am grateful that they were the sort of people who knew how to make themselves at home instead of waiting on me to be a good hostess. I want to be a good hostess, but I’m lousy at remembering to do things like offer drinks and get out the silver tea service. Then again, I don’t have a silver tea service, so that might be why I’m always forgetting it.
The colorless winter is fading and new growth is popping up everywhere!
Accessories: Blushing Bride Pleated Ribbon, Blushing Bride Smooch Spritz, Antique Brad, Oval Punch, Blossom Punch
One of my favorite local arists, Jennifer Levine, dropped off some art for this project. It's sooooo pretty I was dying!
Would he give up his principles to please his colleagues and managers? Or would he abide by his principles and pay the price of becoming lonely. The path of righteousness is always lonely and those who walk through it are very few…
Driving to the airport that morning I had spent plenty of time talking to God. I asked Him for smooth travel, for protection - I asked that He keep Beckett from screaming and crying. I asked that He keep Beckett from having a huge poop explosion while we were cruising at 30 thousand feet. I thanked Him for safe travels thus far. I thanked Him that we had the means to take a trip to Orlando and spend 4 days there with friends...but it was no 20 minute praise session.
Hello my lovelies! Its cocktail time!
As I mentioned above a main character from the comics made her first appearance, Michonne (sp?). I hope the writers do her justice, if not they’ll have a bunch of ticked off comic fans to contend with.
After a bit, Sam glanced over her shoulder. Behind them, the trees were springing back upright as though the invisible rope pulling them downward had been released. A great, howling wind stirred, causing leaves from the forest floor to whirl all around them. Sam's hair came loose from her ponytail and whipped all around her face.
You also can learn something important about the difference between Pisces and Cancer by considering a third important ingredient of a zodiac sign. Zodiac signs have four important ingredients:
The remainder will appear at the City of Westminster Magistrates Court later on Monday, the statement said.
A fraction of a second he waited.
And the biggest secret of all?
Levi belongs to the most conservative and isolated of all Amish sects—the Swartzentruber Amish. Even before meeting Grace, Levi had begun to question some of their teachings. He has considered leaving, but knows he will be banned forever from contact with his younger siblings and widowed mother—who need him to survive. He is torn between his love for Grace and his responsibility to his family.
michelledclarke and justmissy5! Please contact me ASAP ladies!
Feel free to partake in a libation in her honor as you make your vote Thursday.
In the world that I grew up in
Tip: Having a larger diameter cardboard circle to place the cone on will add support and stabilization to the structure when pushing toothpicks into the styrofoam and especially when the finished structure is being moved around or transported.
That is my prayer until Amen -
and my favorite,
Full Sail Bourbon Barrel Age
So I figure I'll just create a separate post just to answer and comment back... and I think I will do this every so often =)
The Boogaloo
As we know our Grain Elevators are becoming a scarce fixture on the prairies because of neglect, fire or just being torn down to make room for the new concrete grain silos of the future. It is so heartbreaking to see such an important part of our farming history turn to dust...so it was decided that in memory of these landmarks we would put out a call to folks across Canada to hook a Grain Elevator Rug. Below you will find a small sampling of the rugs created for this show...I apologize for not listing the creator's name...I was madly dashing about trying to take pics before the hoards of hookers came to view them. If you would like to find out more about this traveling exhibit please go to our blog where you will be able to find a link to our group & any information you may need.
1. The Pondering Turtle: a blog by a delightful young woman. I found her blog a few days after she first started it…and her post was about how she had clicked on the “like” button and couldn’t figure out how to get it taken off her post…. “liking herself”
I chose a watercolor painting as the object for the audio video project. To make it interesting, I took close-up, detailed images that show the brush strokes and the texture of the paper to reveal the artists’ style of painting. To obtain the images, a video camera was first used. But my use of a flip camera resulted in blurry images and shaky pans even with the camera attached to a tripod. Instead, a digital camera was used to obtain the same video camera effects that the video editin
We can't forget the desserts too! My auntie made this delicious cookie tray, JustJenn brought delicious and cute cupcakes and my cousin made these fried cookies.
Moon could only manage a nervous smile and his little tongue poked out as he looked around at his assembled Mod friends, and now good friends.
I am descended from one tough, tough, tough, IRON-tough old man.
Our comfort with that path makes it harder for us to see that even though the ‘way we have always done things’ has led us to success in the past, it may not in the future.
have been frequented by the sheep drovers who passed through this part
General Secretary, National Union of Teachers
On that note, one of my other favorite shows - and perhaps my dark horse nominee for the current best show on TV - is Showtime's Shameless. You want to talk about survival horror? There's a show about what it's really like to live on the lowest rung of society, living from hand to mouth with no room for margin. Being poor does a marvelous job of clarifying your options: living so close to the ground means you can't be picky about opportunities. You have to compromise everything in order to make it from one night to the next.
The past 10 years have been tumultuous for Swindon; going through the pain of administration nearly 10 years ago, suffering a playoff loss to Brighton 8 years ago, becoming the first former Premier League club to drop to the bottom tier of the English football league in 2006, and suffering two Wembley heartbreaks in two years. But this promotion, under a manager who has done so well with a club that was in disarray at the start of the season, tastes all the sweeter after a terrible season that ended under the stewardship of the hapless Paul Hart.
We may not be ready for a national strike ballot next week or next month, but we need to be declaring disputes, making preparations and mobilising members.
I've outgrown my current storage system - I thought I had this under control by using these IKEA racks to hold my "mostly used" punches
Let me start with the older one. I have my broadband service from this network. Till sometime now, I have been living in the city :Chennai. Suddenly the network decides that I live in Kanchipuram. According to them, my pin code(zip) falls into Kanchipuram. Been hitting my head against brick walls saying the city is Chennai, may be the district is Kanchipuram. I guess all this struggle started around September?! Anyways, long story cut short – I have been getting etiquette lessons about how I must speak even if I am the frustrated paying customer who gets no resolution to the issue (though after every phone call, get a text message saying issue resolved!!!)
Yet even these ones, stunned silly, cannot help but praise God—perhaps even in spite of themselves. Whatever the case, one thing is for certain: the appropriate response to the action of God’s grace, wherever it is seen, is to praise God and God alone. I can’t imagine there is anything else we can do but give glory to God who gives grace where no grace is deserved, to those who can do nothing to earn it, to those who barely have the strength and the power to even come before God and ask for it. As it is, the man asked Jesus for nothing that day with his mouth—we read none of his words. As it is, Jesus demonstrated God’s grace that day quite apart from the man’s merit. And God deserved all the praise.
didn't bother trying to venture out into that incredible dogs breakfast
Good for another 80+ years I think, and they made a good practice run for some of the other wrought iron furniture I have….
1And when he had opened the seventh seal, there was silence in heaven about the space of half an hour.
It’s looking a bit better since I first started. From bottom to top is rhubarb – one large clump I inherited and three small crowns I put in. Then there’s the ‘soon to be gone’ weed patch – I’m planning to put sweetcorn in there. Next is the new asparagus bed – two rows of 6 plants, varieties Backlim, Darlise and Gijnlim – in 3 years time I’ll be harvesting the first full crop! Then there’s the beans and potatoes.
Indeed, compliance with the certification against forum shopping is separate from, and independent of, the avoidance of forum shopping itself. Thus, there is a difference in the treatment – in terms of imposable sanctions – between failure to comply with the certification requirement and violation of the prohibition against forum shopping. The former is merely a cause for the dismissal, without prejudice, of the complaint or initiatory pleading, while the latter is a ground for summary dismissal thereof and constitutes direct contempt.
More wisdom is latent in things as they are than in all the words men use-
Photo Gallery
"emmmmm" (emerie)
Director: J. Lisa Chang
Except--my second time in the tanning bed (for only 13 minutes) I ended up looking like a cooked to perfection lobster! I look absolutely ridiculous with skin that looks like it could glow in the dark. With the help of bottles and bottles of after sun aloe lotion, hopefully I will not end up looking like a lizard shedding its skin. And if I am lucky I will have a decent tan before we take off to Aruba and will be able to spend a fabulous time soaking up the sun and lounging by the pool.
“We will also be giving our Test Driver Alexander Rossi his first FP1 run with us in Barcelona and we are all looking forward to giving him the chance to work with us at a full race weekend. He did a good job in Abu Dhabi when we ran him in the young driver test in 2011 and I am sure he will perform well for us on Friday in Spain.”
About Me:
■Cost: $205 w/Free shipping (save $44.69)
1Keep on loving each other as brothers. 2Do not forget to entertain strangers, for by so doing some people have entertained angels without knowing it. 3Remember those in prison as if you were their fellow prisoners, and those who are mistreated as if you yourselves were suffering.
Instead of eating lunch, you fast.
While we're on the subject of inter-species communication, I hung out with some schooly people last night, my first real socializing since Dragonstar and I returned last week from ARGH. The occasion was a new book group. I've never belonged to a book group. But there was the promise of wine and tasty things to eat, so I figured what the hell.
A wiki where fans edit information about things they like. Another example of a wiki that is somewhat of an offsping of wikipedia. As Wikipedia has gotten more formal in editing requirements, those who like the free-er atmosphere from the early days of wikipedia are moving elsewhere to places like this. This wiki has no notability requirements. Anything can be added that one likes.
For my review, Samantha sent me the Polished Silver Necklace. And instantly, I was in love. The quality of this necklace is incredible. One of the neat features of this necklace is actually the chain! Not only is it very light, it's adjustable! I like this because no matter what type of shirt I am wearing, I can match this necklace with it! You can wear it higher up near your collar bones, or lower to pair with a v-neck or low-cut shirt.
"If the world were merely seductive, that would be easy. If it were merely challenging, that would be no problem. But I arise in the morning torn between a desire to save the world and a desire to savor the world. This makes it hard to plan the day."
Other cases show that after someone has been deported, they often beat Canadian officials back into the country.
I'd say it's rapidly catching up, though, and the experimental stuff, like the hibiscus amber at Dieu de Ciel, is equivalent to the stuff American brewers are doing, with its own direction. Canadian brewers, and particularly Quebecois brewers, explore things with less fear of having the results labeled as "girly beers," and I think that's a very good thing. There seemed to be less of the embrace of the EXtrEme beer, which I also think is a good thing.
As far as pulling out bushes goes, Patrick and I yanked (with the tractor and chains) and dug (with shovels) out all the bushes except for the gardenias, the palm trees, 2 other kinds of trees that I have no idea what they are, and, of course, we didn't touch the stupid, huge clumps of decorative grass. haha
People keep telling me I’m courageous to write about my grief, and perhaps it does take courage to let people see me at my most vulnerable, especially when I remember that the grieving me will be living forever in cyberspace. Even if I find peace or new meaning or happiness, that vulnerable part will still be accessible to anyone with a connection to the internet. But that is a small price to pay to be able to get my message across.
Illamasqua Fatal in crease & blended outwards
guys, guys, it's happened. i'm now old enough to get nostaligic and actually have the knowledge to reference by gone eras! haa, i can chat retro shit and not have some 30 year old raise their eyebrows at me. oh.. isn't it kind of wrong that the 90s is now being referenced?
Disclosure of Material Connection: I received this book free from NavPress Publishers as part of their Blogger Review Program. I was not required to write a positive review. The opinions I have expressed are my own. I am disclosing this in accordance with the Federal Trade Commission’s 16 CFR, Part 255: “Guides Concerning the Use of Endorsements and Testimonials in Advertising.
A pre-dawn departure
The two suspects are white.
Why was this good? Because the local River-god (Can't have a river without one) came up to warn and help Psyche. He told her that the sheep were vicious and strong enough to kill her easily, but there was a way to get their precious wool.
After 5 or 6 visits to this years display it was finally quiet enough to photograph it. This years theme is a lot more traditional than in recent years. See the sidebar for links to previous years displays.
Hope y'all are keeping cool in this heat!
future new, greatly expanded master shower
And here’s a list of examples of each type of oil:
Well I cannot tell you just how nervous I am right now....
Once again there is lots going on in this week’s Game of Thrones, but as the season has gone on, the show has sidelined certain storylines for an episode or two, to allow the others to grow and develop. That is precisely what is going on this week.
Then play along with us and post your own creation using InLinkz over on today's post on Karen's Blog!
Well I am home, fed & enjoying a nice cup of tea and still in a little bit of shock.
* Don't burn the sugar while caramelizing .Be careful not to burn your hands either as it will be very hot and can cause burns.
The second most important thing is to not be daunted.
Israel to expel 2,000 African refugees who fled to Eilat
Sye said "I don't discuss Scripture with those that don't hold it as authoritative." Which is a great point, as I get bogged down often here doing just that, with good reason.
I would argue that Mr Glasman knows considerably more about the peoples which he affiliates himself with; this analysis wholly disregards the inconvenient tribal rather than class-based conflict from which true English hero Alfred the Great emerged as a beacon of English nationhood.
For his gift, we got him a bike. I have been planning on this bike since right after Christmas. Seth loves to take the girls each weekend riding on their bikes, and so I knew that he would love to join them! He even has mentioned to me a few times that he was going to use his birthday money from my parents to get him a bike! But, I had him beat! I think he loved it!!! Now he just has to use that birthday money to get a trailer to go behind the bike to haul all these girls around, and he will be set! I just may have to ask for a bike myself this year!
If you would like any further information, please do not hesitate to get in contact with Andrew Flockton, Community Engagement Officer, Foxhill Forum Limited & Wolfe Road Healthy Living Centre, 31-33 Wolfe Road, Foxhill, Sheffield, S6 1BT Tel: 0114 231 5522 Fax: 0114 285 4757 Mobile: 0781 765 8375 Follow on Twitter!! www.twitter.com/FoxhillForum Like Foxhill Forum on Facebook!! www.facebook.com/FoxhillForum
Waited an all-night bakery,
Let cool for about five minutes. While still warm, roll in powdered sugar.
I am seeing.......a very wintery scene outside my dining room window.
And I will now leave you with a blog post from Jenna Fischer (best known for playing the Secretary in the American series of The Office) which came from DailyActor.com. I hope you find it useful and inspiring.
*Sherryl who spends time re-watching favorite old movies all by herself with a rum and coke and a big bag of salt & vinegar chips that she eats until her tongue hurts!
‘He kept me there with him all night – the b****** who thought that raping a child was his due at the end of the night.’
I'm not usually a recipe follower ( I usually create my own from what looks good in the produce store) except when I publish for the Secret Recipe Club where we are expected to follow our assigned blog's recipe. I have to admit, this some of the ingredients in this recipe was very different from anything I would have usually made. I never cook with wine, and I would never think of adding tomato paste to a sauce. However, I followed Melissa's recipe to the Tee ,and I am glad I did.
I can hardly believe it's been six years since the mailman brought us three tubes of sticks from Ty Ty, Georgia.
This is what it comes to, sometimes. Weak tea, staring at the bottom that is not usually seen. Not usually, in those weeks of Fat Tuesdays. But the tea gets drunk, all the same, because that is all there is in the cup. That, and the memory of strength.
100% cotton fabric that would match the cardigan (it doesn't need to be the same color, but it needs to either blend in with the cardigan, or have contrast and match with the flowers that you will accessorize the cardigan with)
Adding the words you like in it with the "Paint" will do the tricks.
-Tony Bennett: I don’t think there needed to be the pretense of Tony being there to talk about movies. I don’t think there needed to be any pretense at all, really. They could have pretended that he would be talking about his new duets album; at least that would have been timely. All he did was ramble on anyway. And this is a good enough impression to be allowed to ramble on like that. The audience was certainly happy to see him. B-
Up in her room a few minutes later, Cindy decides to climb out the window, steal a horse and take out after Jonah Hex. Of course, while she is out looking for Hex, the four killers, who are searching for her and Jonah, happen to see her ride past in the distance and take off after her.
I have a few more boxes to share today. I made four more boxes on Tuesday. I have more free time now since I don't have to go to work for a while. Yay! to that. Now you would think it was a lot of boxes for one day. When you duplicate the same item, it didn't take as much time at all. Plus I had all the embellishment already so each box didn't take much time at all. I forgot to take a picture of the purple box before I sold it. So here are 3 of them.
I've made a very important decision.. are you paying attention? A very important LIFE CHANGING DECISION.
Weakness: Kentucky remains one of the youngest teams in America. Three starters are freshmen and the other two are sophomores. That’s got to keep Coach John Calipari up at night. It didn’t prevent the Wildcats from making it to the Final Four last season, but it’s got to be a concern as this isn’t the same team. If Kentucky’s youth shows at a key moment, it could be a disappointing finish.
Thyme, ½ teaspoon (dried)
Aloo Ghobi
I, however, am a true scarf wearing amateur.
They are generally productive but can lose focus, become scattered, with less follow-through than the other subtype.
It is pantomime season, but if wanting something with a little more substance than your average ‘Oh, yes he is, Oh, no he’s not’ theatre experience, Dion Boucicault’s Arrah-na-Pogue offers all the fun and frolics you could ask for, but with an emotional journey to boot. We went to see the play in the Abbey on Saturday night. Written in 1864, the Abbey theatre held faithful to the script, but the production of the melodrama was modern in its ability to be tongue-in-cheek.
23. Baking soda can be used to help clean up grease spills.
Cumin - 1 tsp
Starring: Stephen Curry, Brendan Gleeson, Daniel MacPherson, Jodi Gordon
1) It's impossible to eat nachos with a handlebar mustache attached to your face with tape...unless the melted cheese dripping from said mustache can be considered part of the costume.
Should you still be an urban rat, like most of us, one can only assume you must be deeply fooked, if not skimp and clueless. Assuming you have a paying job, you can't hope in hell to receive any financial rewards, never mind hold a bank account and use a debit or credit card. Perhaps you've developed the finer art of bartering. Perhaps you're happy to receive indigenous corn, meat and veggies as your reward, provided a few of your black supremacist brothers raised the herds and cultivated the crops free of any agrochemicals and veterinary services.
When people defend the people I've created against other fans, that's when I'll know:
Sorry, just had to do that, it actually made me smile when I thought about it!!!
5. Let them know you've tagged them!
Anyway today is green day, so today’s focus is about what you can start to live without and reduce resources. As times get tighter and we see the news headlines talking about more job losses, higher cost of living and the lack of mortgage lending, cutting back is on all our minds.
My new best friend turned on me and spread a lie about being bipolar and mentally unstable. So I cut the cord and moved on. Soon I got chubby Because food was the only thing I could turn to. The fat jokes started and a new bully emerged. He stalked me on Facebook and tagged my photos with the word boob and other stuff. I blocked him but he went on in real life. Eventually he moved away and I went into the 10th grade. Everything got worse.
Makes one sandwich.
We took a run out to Middle Concho Park today. One of the highlights was catching a photo op of the Great Blue Heron, (Ardea herodias). The Great Blue is I believe my favorite of all of the herons to photograph. This one flew up from the river and lit high in the top of a tree on the other side. I love the way the light breeze was blowing his plumage. He was about 125 yards away.
Kevin Spacey (Outbreak, Seven, The Usual Suspects)
"Such was the level of concern they immediately realised it could be a serious medical incident and took steps to complete the relevant documentation."
Our Hotel Room
oil or ghee for deep frying
Green Chile Sauce:
The worst part them is that she's turning out this amazing stuff EVERY SINGLE DAY. These sort of things aren't like a special Saturday thing, they're constant! There's no getting away from them! Every night at dinner, without fail, there's some sort of calorie-laden desert of awesome . . . awesomeness that's full of awesome, slathered with suburb and drizzled with fantastic. It's all made from scratch. All of it. And it's all FREE! That's the weirdest thing about it all still. There's this desert that you'd see at a bakery or something for some painfully high price, and you probably end up forking over lots of money for them because you KNOW it'll be so good, but the cost sort of helps keep your consumption in check. But not here. Have as much as you want, whenever you want.
represented this weekend, but I'm afraid I've run out of time to get
“Keep the thought of God’s abundance always in mind. If any other thought comes, replace it with that of God’s abundance and bless that abundance. Give thanks constantly, if need be, that the work is done. Do not go back again to the asking. Just bless and give thanks that the work is done, that God is working in you, that you are receiving that which you desire, for you desire only the good that you may give out the good to all. Let this be in silence and in secret. Pray to your Father in secret, and your Father who sees the secret of your soul will reward you openly.
The media landscape continues to shift as new technologies demand new business strategies, but one thing must remain constant during this transition period: credibility. We understand the company needs flexibility to make decisions quickly, and we have afforded the company that flexibility with a labor agreement that allows the company to change newsroom operations and reduce the workforce. However, the Guild has serious doubts that the decision by management to slash the ranks of copy editors will result in a more efficient newsgathering process. Instead, we believe it will result in a loss of credibility as more mistakes and errors appear in print and online.
On certiorari brought by petitioners, the Court of Appeals upheld the trial court’s order. It ruled:
I was falling in love.
Barcelona attacker Lionel Messi has broken Gerd Muller’s record of scoring the most goals in a European season after firing a hat-trick in the Liga encounter against Malaga at Camp Nou.
kate has extended an offer to work with emily on a future project. i personally would love to see that happen. their works go together like peanut butter and jelly. and we would love the opportunity to create another front window display featuring them both again.
The New Alphabet
I have seen so many beautiful tablescapes around blogland. I'm afraid I'm a placematt, plate and utensil kinda gal. I really need to step up my game! While I don't have a dining tablescape to share today, I do have many vingnettes on tables here and there throughout my home.
But unschooling? Unschooling is entirely based on intrinsic motivation.
What I do have is my own coping mechanisms and guidelines to dealing with the questions of interacting with other people, cultures, and beliefs. While they don’t speak to every possible situation, they do give me a starting point from which to consider questions of culture.
19After the Lord Jesus had spoken to them, he was taken up into heaven and he sat at the right hand of God. 20Then the disciples went out and preached everywhere, and the Lord worked with them and confirmed his word by the signs that accompanied it. (Mark 16:15-20)
one other living soul
Monday we did the tech for the show which went all day and into the night.
Oh, where to start. ”In the unlikely event” that teachers spend time preparing and grading equal to classroom time? Has Levy ever taught a class in his life? Also, university faculty do more than teach; they are expected to do research as well, and it is that research that a) burnishes the reputation of the institution which employs them, which is why those institutions are more than casually interested in someone’s research when they grant him or her tenure, and b) in many cases brings money into Universities to support their growing administrative costs (as Farley also points out, a far bigger factor in college costs than faculty salaries).
It seems to me that one of the most interesting potential effects of open innovation is to shift the balance of importance as between different intellectual property rights. A closed innovation model places the greatest emphasis upon control of intellectual assets by a single proprietor: the exclusionary role of patents for inventions and, to a lesser extent, statutory design monopolies, are valuable tools for achieving this end, as is the role played by contract and general legal principles regarding the protection of trade secrets such as manufacturing know-how. With control of a market secured by such means, the role of the trade mark is relatively small. This is because a trade mark is not generally capable of excluding a product or a technology from the market: all it can do is to prevent its commercial exploitation under a particular name or origin-identifier.
This is a thriller. Tell me what is going to thrill me. The real gut of this story is Collin’s ability to receive premonitions in his sleep and then use them to help or harm others. But that is the very last sentence of the query, which makes me worry that you spend the majority of your manuscript on backstory and descriptions of dreams before finally getting to the point. I need to know what this is about before I’m nearly finished reading it. Then, so that I’m not left thinking, “So?” I need to know why this is a problem for Collin and what he does about it. Are there other threads? Friendships or romances, etc?
Wishing you all a fantastic Monday and the start to a beautiful week!!!
Fire & Rain
If I cannot choose should I be held morally responsible for my actions?
See:
One year tomato's would rock...next year carrots would and tomato's suffered.
Even though Charles wasn’t a Christian, he was very wise and knowledgeable, and he had standards, Suzanne thought. He was a one-in-a-million kinda guy; good-looking, well-mannered, well-spoken, loving, spiritual, respectful, intelligent, financially stable, and…Black. A Black Man with all these qualities? What more could she ask for?
Where does one’s interest in style come from and what are the influences? A complex set of interrelated experiences, no doubt, and difficult to identify. In my case, I have 4 siblings, each stylish in their own individual ways.
Thursday 3rd November 6 – 8.30pm The J. 60 Noosa Drive, Noosa Heads
I reflect on paintings, such as Woman with Necklace, and I think of simple times. Times of leisure. When people knew how to slow down. This museum helps me quiet myself. I notice my surroundings in a way that escapes me when I get caught up in the busyness of life. I am happy here.
The flip-flop is originally a New Zealand invention, inspired by the Japanese rice straw and wood zori sandals used with kimono. Havaianas follow the original simple, functional design and sometimes feature a small symbol such as the Brazilian flag on the strap. The name Havaianas is Portuguese for Hawaiians.
The Farrelly brothers for absurd, often offensive comedies with enough heart thrown in to usually keep them from collapsing into childish farce. They do not always succeed. Shallow Hal has its flaws, but it perhaps surprisingly hits quite a few marks. It is worth watching if you do not mind not taking a romantic comedy very seriously. Shallow Hal is not a full fledged chick flick.
“Pregnancy is a pre-existing condition. Didn’t know that did you? Gee, the way Joe tells it, sounds like having a baby is a disease. We’re just walking around like Perdue oven roasters waiting for our timer to pop, is that it?
They're still there he's all gone
This book would be great for a book club wanting a light read. There are many aspects that would make for great discussion, especially the differences between being a strong woman and a woman of strength.
The influence of the teacher will matter far more than the contents of the article. I think it's a mistake when teachers ask new students why they came, and I think the wise student should prepare a vague and uninformative answer for any such question, as I did before my very first class.
Has there not been a time when you felt alone? You may have felt that all had forsaken you. I want to go back to Acts 16:25, 26 for an example of loneliness. Paul and Silas were in the Philippian gaol.
The milk stout (5.2% ABV), Ben says, was Turtle Stone's first batch as a licensed brewery and comes from his recipe file built up from over a decade of homebrewing. It was done in a smaller batch because he was still getting a feel for the pilot system. He plans to take a couple of sixtels of the milk stout to the AC beer fest, but more of the two other brews.
but don't let them become second homes. Having many homes adds clutter to your digital world
One might imagine that a person would derive a considerable ego boost from claiming to channel these high-level beings, but then, some people want very much to keep their connection with the Famous “Dead” on the down low. I described such a person in my post “A Reluctant Channeler”:
Trent Veldkamp : Bought SanDisk Sansa Clip+ 4GB Indigo MP3 Player SDMX18 as a xmas gift
We'll find out in the long run
For rival teams to replicate this system, they will need to find space to package the ducts inside the footwell area. As we saw in 2010, teams can be very imaginative in creating way to package this sort of solution. But this will take time and may explain some team’s opposition to the legality of the system.
Chickweed grows freely here in Tennessee all through winter and into early spring when the tiny white star flowers appear. Some folks think of this invasive weed as a real bother so they spend lots of energy pulling it up just to replace it with another plant which may be no more nutritious or valuable than the chickweed! (We use to do the same thing until we found out how good it was!)
So… I guess that was quite a lot of questions and sentiments. All that came from me contemplating on whether or not I should give you a pack of cookies. I don’t know. Ordinary things just get me thinking, that’s all.
The effect you have on me musically… is beautiful.
Per the website...
So, I am almost done with his hair and I call Evan.
The snow they send to meet me won't defeat me
"I'm just getting used to having no attention and the crowd. There's plenty of love here though Greenie, and besides, Betty does a truly wonderful Sunday roast. I don't care what people say about your mad British cows".
Don’t even get me started on Annie. What a spoiler she is. LOL. I really liked her, and then Chapter 31 happened, and now she’s even MORE fascinating if that’s even possible. I swear, that chapter was better than all of the Vampire Knight plot twists COMBINED. And that’s not something I say lightly.
Fated and powdery;
There are many problems that arise to a person because of which he has to face a lot of problems for treating them. In this way, there is a problem that mostly happens to kids and they are sometimes habitual to it. The name of that problem is Eczema. It is a problem that happens with a kid due to itching and rubbing on a same part of body for a long time. There is a solution available to most of the people for the problem and that is Cream for Eczema. This cream is available in most of the parts of the world and on many medical shops. Generally, they are of low cost and are affordable from every section of society. Its application can provide relief to the children from the problem which they are facing actually.
16. Rehang Bub photo in office (FREE)
When he was insulted, he returned no insult;
I did loads of research on everything from Renaissance philosophy to the design of Venetian galley ships – so much so I almost got lost in research for a while! But if I had not done all the hunting and gathering I did, I would not have found the magical hooks that made the story come alive. History is full of so much fantastic raw material for stories.
This is a little video short on The Artist Guide to Success in the Music Business. Yup, gotta throw in a plug now and then for the book you know???
The Afterglow:
The Cabal does not control all of the military, as we see what will be happening, the mass arrests, etc.
It makes a vital contribution to the life of anyone who wants to avail themself of the services, and provides wholesome programs for children and youth.
I want money to be a positive thing in my life, not just one more frustration.
Some of them talk to their handsets like it’s war.
Thats me, what did you get?
One of my "Eagerly Anticipated Books of 2011" is here!
Key Employees 17
The New Season On BBC1.
It's always a bloody Friday afternoon...
My personal favourite this time has been a little redhead.
How can we say forever
What we are seeing here is the beginning of a process – also seen in the changes to Unemployment Insurance in the stimulus – to Federalize the remaining elements of the social welfare state that are run by the individual states, and to establish uniform levels of eligibility and benefit. In other words, Medicaid is the future of single-payer health care in America.
The more I think about it, the more I realize just how scary this really is. We all know that the events of September 11 were carried out by a group of radicals. Civil wars in various nations, over many years, have factions that harbor a little more zeal than the rest of their affiliated groups. But we know that if we take those zealots/ radicals out of the equation, there is general order. The majority of citizens are just trying to get along in the situation they’re in.
mission to the Sultan of Chandra. There he
In 1997, more than a decade before the 2008 World Financial Crisis speahearded by the collapse of the Lehman Bros in the US, Asia-Pacific was rocked by the Asian Financial Crisis. Back then, I still remember vividly reading in the newspaper of how Thailand's stock market had spiralled out of control, and how shortly, HK's stock market crashed subsequently as well. Thus, started a domino effect, with Malaysia, Singapore, Indonesia, and Japan all becoming embroiled in the crisis. Of cos, the country affected the most by far, was South Korea. Til then, the economies of the Asia-Pacific had been going strong and growing by admirable figures. Then it all came crashing down with the expose of the failings and weaknesses of the Asian banking and financial sector. There was painful reforms which almost all the Asian economies had to go thru and this is why with the 2008 Financial Crisis, Asian economies were not affected as badly (although still very badly during the worst period in late 08-mid 09 with countries like Singapore and Malaysia slipping into recession) and now rebounding back at an amazingly rapid pace and growing with impressive figures-Singapore, for example, is forecast to grow by over 5% GDP this yr in 2010. Other Asian economies are forecast to have comparable GDP growth rates too.
Hope all my readers and friends had a great long weekend... we ended up going to Canada on Saturday, and on the way up the river was super high, and the white water rafting was going strong. By the time we got back from Canada, around dusk, the rafting had stopped and people were camping and having major cookouts. I was starved, and so wanted to stop and ask them for a burger, lol!
When I told my dad that skydiving was an option today, he said to me, “So, are you going to go skydiving? Or are you going to wuss out?”
For this year's A-Z challenge, I'm posting juicy tidbits of researchy goodness for your interest and edification. I intend to use these as story prompts for the terrifying writing challenge Story a Day in May. You may use them however you wish.
This afternoon, European Central Bank (ECB) boss Mario Draghi said he would be prepared to broaden the role of his bank to encompass more and bigger bond purchases. Tomorrow, Angela Merkel will address the Bundestag to say she wouldn’t. This evening in Toulon, as I write, Nicolas Sarkozy is explaining to the French why he is the man to steer the country through the crisis.
Last year, my roommate and I went up to McGregor, MN, and spent the 07/04/2009 weekend up there.
Stamps: Crafty Secrets
gone with the flow.
I found our through her blog that Laurie was going to be getting some chickens. (of which she since has and is currently in chick bliss). Perfect! I contacted her regarding a Good Egg Interview and she readily accepted the offer. Such a good fit.
This is the most recent addition. Mindy Gledhill is a recording artist who I believe was affiliated with Deseret Book for a time. If you have the "Trek: A Nashville Tribute to the Pioneers" she performs two songs on that album. She performs "Emma" from the album "Joseph: A Nashville Tribute to Joseph Smith". She has also sung on the album "Baby Mine" produced by Scott Wiley full of lullabye and bedtime songs for children. Her two solo albums are "The Sum of All Grace" and "Feather In the Wind". I really like Mindy Gledhill, and while I enjoyed her second album, "The Sum of All Grace" happens to be my favorite, and I listen to it often. She blogs about her life, her kids, her music, everything. It's a fairly new blog.
Interestingly Scottish Green co-convener Patrick Harvie said:
The weekend went by too fast, but it was a great time that Mom and I spent exploring the city. We never ate at the same place twice and walked off any food we consumed with the multiple mile walks we did. Come visit again soon!
Well, there was definitely no dining going on here. This was actually the cleanest spot (if you can call it that) in the whole place. Turns out my cousin had been cleaning here because that’s where all his dad’s stuff and the games were stored. Sitting at the back of the room was an old metal workshop desk which weighed about 400 pounds and I was lucky enough to get to take all the way to the dumpster. This apartment is on the second floor…
Nowhere in the Bible do we find Jesus cursing anyone (the only thing He cursed
Tim Morton and I are currently forging together our respective positions. Where this will lead, I don’t know and I think Tim provides structural reasons as to why I can’t know in advance where it will lead. Right now I’m tentatively thinking of my own position as something akin to an eco-Marxism. Eco-Marxism wouldn’t simply be a Marxism that takes into account “the environment”, but rather would significantly expand the domain of Marxist thought. On the one hand, eco-Marxism would include nonhuman actors such as animal, mineral, and quantum beings within its scope. Put differently, the index wouldn’t simply be to human emancipation. I’m still thinking through this. On the other hand, drawing on Morton’s concept of the mesh, such a Marxism would focus on the imbrication of humans with all sorts of other media (in McLuhan’s sense) generating local manifestations that prevent us from strictly dividing the human from the nonhuman (think of Latour’s and Stengers’ networks or Deleuze and Guattari’s machinic assemblages). While this aspect of eco-Marxism would be thoroughly relational in character, it would emphasize that relations are always relations of exteriority. In other words, no entity can be reduced to its relations and the local manifestations it produces, but rather every entity harbors within it a withdrawn being in excess of its local manifestations (this approaches the diachronic dimension of Tim’s thought). This withdrawn dimension is the promise of forming collectives otherwise. Where an internalism of relations tends to lead to the conclusion that we’re stuck because all terms are caught in reciprocal relations with one another, the exteriority of relations gives us the resources for thinking change. Here the focus is not so much on critique, but rather, as Latour puts it, composition. That is, the work of politics and ethics is the composition of new collectives of humans and nonhumans opening the possibility of new ways of living. That’s just where my thought is leading. Tim might very well be on a different page.
...take naps to rev up some energy...
people used to spend quite a bit of time alone
Instead of doing 3 chain...
Burt's Bees, $14.99
Later in the year we’d return to the frog pond and there would be tiny froglets everywhere on land. As we trudged through the grass – usually following a rabbit path – it’s hard to say how many we ended up treading on but over the years I bet I’ve killed hundreds although never deliberately; I wasn’t that kind of kid. The atmosphere was always a bit different once the frogs were out and about. I always found the place a bit creepy then as if I was outnumbered, which I was, by thousands to one, but I couldn’t say that I was afraid, not in any real sense (they weren’t interested in us in the slightest) although there was a . . . I’m going to go with ‘potentiality’ . . . a potentiality in the air, a sense that something might happen. Put it this way, when I read what Heaney wrote in ‘Omphalos’:
Next in the series: choosing the "floor" of the garden. Wishing everyone a lovely weekend and as always, thank you for visiting!
Thinking back, that’s exactly what this kupiah-wearing snake did. I should have been more wary and suspicious of people instead of being so trusting; and had I known about these characteristics, I surely would have. This unpleasant encounter seemed to confirm my earlier concerns about stepping out of the shadows and rejoining society.
As I wander down the path of life, instead of viewing the Golden Gates far down the road, I have the ability to experience and enjoy life while I am fit, able and full of energy, so I can look back and know I tried everything I wanted to at the time.
A and B showed up to sign the lease and pay the deposit, and I got my first interaction with B – and I was not happy. She didn’t do anything in particular, but she was pretty rude and demanding toward me, and if she had shown up to fill out the applications I knew I wouldn’t have considered them. How a person treats you at the first showing really says a lot about how the relationship will go, I can go back to almost each and every eviction we’ve had and point things out that I should have picked up on, and I knew she’d be trouble. But we put in that clause in our lease and we had already approved them – so at that point we just had to move forward.
Congrats to all the winners and a HUGE thank you to all the wonderful sponsors!
Dec 8 Flex Vienna, Austria
